ASSESSING THE EFFECTIVENESS OF BIM AS A COMMUNICATION AND COLLABORATION TOOLS IN THE PHILIPPINE CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRY
 
 
A Thesis Proposal
Presented to the
Faculty of the Graduate School of Engineering
ADAMSON UNIVERSITY
 
 
 
 
In Partial Fulfillment
of the Requirements for the Degree
MASTER OF SCIENCE IN CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT
 
 
 
By:
KEN V. CABANLIG
 
 
 
ENGR. CRISPIN LICTAOA
Thesis Adviser
 
 
 
 
DR. FLORANTE D. POSO JR.
Course Adviser
 
 
 
December 2024
 
 
TABLE OF CONTENTS
CHAPTER
TITLE




I
THE PROBLEM AND ITS SETTING




Background of the Study


3


Statement of the Problem


7


Significance of the Study


8


Scope and Delimitation


10
II
THEORETICAL FRAMEWORK






Review of Conceptual Literature


12


Review of Research Studies


14


Conceptual Framework


16


Conceptual Paradigm


19


Research Hypothesis


20


Definition of Terms


21
III
METHODOLOGY






Research Design


24


Research Locale


25


Population & Sampling


26


Research Instruments


27


Data Gathering Procedures


28


Data Analysis Procedures


29

 
Chapter One
THE PROBLEM AND ITS SETTING
A. Background of the Study
 
Globally, the construction industry played a foundational role in economic development, delivering critical infrastructure for transportation, housing, utilities, and public services. Despite its contributions, the industry consistently faced persistent challenges in communication and collaboration, particularly in large-scale, multidisciplinary projects involving architects, engineers, project managers, contractors, and subcontractors. These professionals, often working remotely or across different phases of a project, relied heavily on effective communication to ensure a shared understanding of project objectives, design intent, task responsibilities, and safety protocols. However, miscommunication, ambiguity, and delays remained common, especially in projects with complex scopes and layered organizational structures.
During the course of many construction projects, communication practices had been fragmented. Project stakeholders often depended on a mix of phone calls, text messages, emails, messaging apps, and informal meetings to exchange updates and resolve issues. Although these channels enabled quick interaction, their lack of integration frequently led to inconsistent information flows, misaligned expectations, and errors in execution. These problems contributed to rework, missed deadlines, and cost escalations. The absence of centralized documentation or real-time coordination systems further worsened the situation, as project drawings, schedules, and updates were sometimes outdated, inaccessible, or misunderstood.
Another critical issue observed in the industry was early-stage misalignment. Project teams often lacked a unified understanding of deliverables, milestones, responsibilities, and constraints at the onset. This lack of alignment led to inefficient task allocation, unrealistic timeframes, unclear contact points, and scope misinterpretations, eventually resulting in resource misallocation and project disruption. While some level of scope evolution was expected in construction, poor coordination at the start significantly increased the risk of misunderstandings and performance gaps.
Additionally, many projects experienced difficulties in managing essential data such as architectural drawings, schedules, permits, and regulatory requirements. Information was scattered across disconnected systems and platforms, and stakeholders were frequently overwhelmed with nonessential or redundant data, creating an environment of information overload. These inefficiencies resulted in poor decision-making, outdated guidance, and difficulties in ensuring compliance or responding to changes in real time. Organizations that addressed these issues began implementing centralized document control systems and structured onboarding programs, allowing teams to tie documentation to specific workflows and minimize confusion.
It also became evident that decision-making processes were affected by slow approvals and a lack of real-time project data. The absence of timely and reliable information limited stakeholders’ ability to make informed decisions, particularly in high-pressure or rapidly evolving project environments. As a result, collaboration suffered, and progress stalled, despite the best efforts of project leaders and technical personnel.
To address these longstanding problems, the construction industry turned to digital tools, including Building Information Modeling (BIM), social media platforms, and Information and Communication Technology (ICT) systems. Of these, BIM emerged as one of the most transformative solutions. BIM enabled teams to develop centralized digital models containing real-time data about a project’s physical and functional characteristics. These models helped visualize the project across various stages, from design to delivery, and improved coordination among teams. Research by Eastman et al. (2020) underscored how 3D and 4D BIM models allowed stakeholders to detect design conflicts early and correct them before construction began, thereby avoiding rework and delays.
BIM’s benefits also included enhanced accuracy and timeliness of shared information, as noted by Kwofie, Aigbavboa, and Baiden-Amissah (2020). However, their findings also revealed limitations such as information overload, restricted data access (gatekeeping), and lack of role clarity. These limitations made it difficult for all project members to access the information they needed or fully understand their responsibilities. Thus, even as BIM was adopted for its visualization and coordination advantages, it could not resolve communication issues on its own unless supported by sound management practices.
Other tools such as social media were also used to enhance communication in construction projects. Platforms like WhatsApp and Facebook Messenger were leveraged for real-time updates, instant feedback, and quick coordination. Research by Yang, Ahuja, and Shankar (2019) confirmed that social media could promote timely feedback loops and improve team cohesion. Nonetheless, they also warned of associated risks like information overload, data privacy breaches, and the lack of professionalism, which sometimes led to communication inefficiencies rather than improvements.
To measure the quality of project communication more objectively, Trach, Lesovik, and Tomaszkiewicz (2023) applied fuzzy logic and Social Network Analysis (SNA) to evaluate stakeholder interactions. Fuzzy logic translated subjective judgments, such as clarity, timeliness, and accuracy, into measurable data. SNA further identified critical communication roles (e.g., project managers, site engineers) and highlighted the risks of overcentralized information flows. Their findings suggested that when too much information depended on a few individuals, the project’s efficiency became vulnerable to bottlenecks or personnel turnover.
Regionally, studies from Poland and other European countries emphasized that communication challenges were among the leading causes of project delays and cost overruns. Kania, Radziszewska-Zielina, and Śladowski (2021) recommended adopting digital tools like BIM to streamline communication flows, particularly in project environments involving multiple, rotating team members. These findings aligned with the realities observed in the Philippine construction sector, which faced similar systemic communication issues.
In the Philippines, the construction industry experienced parallel challenges. Although recognized as a major economic driver, the sector remained dependent on manual workflows and traditional communication methods. While some large-scale projects had adopted BIM for coordination and visualization, its broader implementation remained limited. According to a national study by Bagcal et al. (2019), only 33.6% of professionals in the AEC industry were actively using BIM despite the industry encompassing over 16,300 licensed contractors. High software costs, lack of skilled personnel, resistance to change, and unclear data governance policies were cited as major barriers.
To bridge these challenges, international standards like ISO 19650 provided a roadmap for organizing project information through BIM. ISO 19650 emphasized structured data exchange, role clarity, accountability, and the use of a Common Data Environment (CDE) to improve transparency. The standard also encouraged efficient information workflows through the development of Master Information Delivery Plans (MIDPs) and Task Information Delivery Plans (TIDPs). When applied effectively, these frameworks helped eliminate data fragmentation and enabled better stakeholder collaboration.
This study, therefore, investigated the effectiveness of BIM in improving communication and collaboration within the Philippine construction industry. Specifically, it assessed BIM's impact on five key parameters:
1. Project Efficiency - Since BIM’s integrated modeling has been shown to cut project timelines and reduce errors. For instance, Das, Khursheed, and Paul (2025) reported that BIM adoption across multiple case studies reduced project durations by an average of 20 % and costs by 15 %, while decreasing design errors by 30 % and RFIs by 25 %.
2. Stakeholder Engagement – It centralized 3D/4D visualizations foster greater participation and shared understanding. The National Institute of Building Sciences (2021) found that BIM implementations increased stakeholder involvement in review sessions by over 40 %, improved asset quality, and reduced rework and waste through transparent, model‑based workflows.
3. Decision‑Making Processes – It emphasized BIM’s real‑time data capabilities, which streamline approval cycles. RICS (2024) highlighted that BIM‑driven dashboards, fed by live sensor and progress data, accelerated decision‑making and improved accuracy in change management by providing instant access to up‑to‑date project information.
4. Cost and Resource Optimization – It shows the importance in controlling budgets and minimizing waste. Mohamed et al. (2024) demonstrated that integrating 5D BIM with Value Engineering yielded a 35 % reduction in overall material costs and a 42 % cut in floor material usage on a residential twin‑villa case study, thereby optimizing resource allocation and budget adherence.
5. Risk Mitigation and Quality Improvement - BIM’s clash detection and risk‑analysis tools enhance safety and quality control. Moshtaghian and Noorzai (2023) applied an AHP‑based BIM risk management framework and showed that it prioritized financial, sustainability, and safety risks dynamically, leading to more proactive hazard identification and a measurable improvement in overall project performance.
It also explored the challenges that hindered BIM implementation, identified management strategies that addressed those barriers, and evaluated how these strategies aligned with ISO 19650 standards. Furthermore, the study examined how stakeholder perceptions varied across roles (contractors, project managers, architects/engineers, and clients) and how demographic factors such as professional experience and organization type influenced those perceptions.
Ultimately, the study aimed to generate evidence-based insights and practical recommendations to help the Philippine construction industry transition more effectively into a collaborative, digital future. By addressing persistent communication issues and leveraging BIM's full potential through structured frameworks like ISO 19650, the industry stood to benefit from improved project delivery, greater accountability, and enhanced sustainability.
B. Statement of the Problem
 
Despite the global shift toward digital technologies in construction, the Philippine sector continued to face persistent challenges in communication and collaboration. These issues significantly affected project timelines, quality, cost efficiency, and stakeholder coordination. The complexity of projects involving multidisciplinary teams operating under tight schedules further exacerbated these problems.
Traditional communication methods—such as phone calls, emails, text messages, and informal meetings—were widely used. While they enabled quick exchanges, their fragmented use often led to information gaps, delayed feedback, and unclear responsibilities. As a result, many projects suffered from rework, cost overruns, and inefficiencies.
Building Information Modeling (BIM) emerged as a potential solution, offering a centralized digital platform for integrating and managing project data. It enabled teams to visualize tasks, manage information, and collaborate in real time. However, BIM adoption in the Philippines remained uneven, especially among small to medium-sized firms, due to technical, financial, and organizational barriers that limited its full impact.
Even among adopters, questions remained about BIM’s effectiveness in improving communication. It was unclear how well BIM supported key performance parameters such as project efficiency, stakeholder engagement, decision-making, cost and resource optimization, and risk mitigation. Evidence was also limited on the barriers to full BIM integration and how local practices aligned with international standards like ISO 19650.
Moreover, it was uncertain whether stakeholder perceptions of BIM’s effectiveness differed across roles—such as contractors, project managers, architects, engineers, and clients. Each group had different communication needs and responsibilities that could shape their experience. Likewise, factors such as professional role, years of experience, and organization type may have influenced how BIM was perceived as a communication and collaboration tool.
 
C. Significance of the Study
This study aims to evaluate the effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) in enhancing communication and collaboration in construction projects, specifically within the Philippine construction industry. By addressing persistent challenges such as miscommunication, information overload, lack of role clarity, and poor decision-making processes, the research seeks to provide actionable insights for construction professionals to optimize BIM implementation. These optimizations aim to reduce misinterpretations, streamline workflows, enhance decision-making, and improve overall project outcomes, addressing critical issues in the construction process. The research underscores the importance of adopting innovative technologies like BIM to transform communication and collaboration processes, enhancing project efficiency, resilience, and quality. It aligns with Sustainable Development Goal (SDG) 9: Industry, Innovation, and Infrastructure by promoting technological innovation and improving the efficiency and sustainability of construction projects. Additionally, it supports SDG 12: Responsible Consumption and Production by demonstrating how structured information management through BIM can reduce errors, minimize resource wastage, and promote lifecycle efficiency in construction practices.
The findings of this study will benefit a wide range of stakeholders within the construction industry. For construction professionals, the research offers strategies to overcome communication barriers, optimize processes, and leverage BIM's potential in managing complex projects. Policymakers can utilize these insights to develop guidelines that encourage the adoption of BIM and promote sustainable practices across the sector. Researchers will find valuable information to advance studies on BIM applications for addressing communication and collaboration challenges. Furthermore, clients and project owners will benefit from enhanced project transparency, improved stakeholder engagement, and increased trust in project delivery. By addressing critical communication issues and showcasing BIM’s potential, this research contributes to the advancement of the Philippine construction industry, fostering innovation, sustainability, and operational efficiency in the sector.
 
C.1 General Objective
 
This study aimed to assess the effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) as a communication and collaboration tool within the Philippine construction industry. It focused on how BIM addressed common project challenges such as miscommunication, information gaps, unclear responsibilities, and delays in decision-making. The study also provided insights into current practices and briefly considered how these practices aligned with internationally recognized frameworks such as ISO 19650, where relevant.
C.2 Specific Objectives
1. To assess the effectiveness of BIM in enhancing communication and collaboration within the Philippine construction industry by examining five parameters: (a) Project Efficiency, (b) Stakeholder Engagement, (c) Decision-Making Processes, (d) Cost and Resource Optimization, and (e) Risk Mitigation and Quality Improvement.
2. To identify the key challenges and barriers faced in implementing BIM as a communication and collaboration tool in the Philippine construction industry, focusing on how these obstacles affect the five parameters of BIM effectiveness identified in specific objective number 1.
3. To determine the management practices and strategies that can address these challenges and barriers, ensuring alignment with the five parameters of BIM effectiveness identified in specific objective number 1, and compare these practices with ISO 19650 standards for information management.
4. To determine the significant difference in perception among key stakeholders when they are grouped according to (a) contractors, (b) project managers, (c) supervisors which include architects/engineers, and (d) clients with regard to the effectiveness, challenges, and potential of BIM as a communication and collaboration tool in the Philippine construction industry, with reference to the five parameters of BIM effectiveness identified in specific objective number 1.
5. To investigate the significant relationships between demographic factors (e.g., role, years of experience, type of organization) and the five parameters of BIM effectiveness (i.e., Project Efficiency, Stakeholder Engagement, Decision-Making, Cost and Resource Optimization, and Risk Mitigation & Quality Improvement).
 
D. Scope and Delimitation
This study focused on assessing the effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) as a communication and collaboration tool within the Philippine construction industry. It examined how BIM addressed persistent challenges such as miscommunication, delayed information exchange, unclear task responsibilities, and inconsistent stakeholder coordination.​
The research encompassed a diverse range of construction projects, including residential, commercial, infrastructure, and industrial developments. It centered on five key performance parameters: (1) Project Efficiency, (2) Stakeholder Engagement, (3) Decision-Making Processes, (4) Cost and Resource Optimization, and (5) Risk Mitigation and Quality Improvement.​
Participants included construction professionals with practical experience in using BIM tools for communication and coordination. These comprised project managers, engineers, contractors, architects, and clients.
While the study primarily focused on BIM as the main platform for communication and collaboration, it briefly considered the alignment of observed practices with selected principles from ISO 19650, particularly concerning structured communication and data management. Tools and platforms not integrated with BIM, such as informal messaging apps and unstructured email threads, were excluded from the core analysis.​
The findings were therefore most applicable to construction teams and organizations engaged in BIM-enabled projects, offering insights into how BIM supported collaboration across various project types and stakeholder roles within the Philippine context.​
 
 
 
Chapter 2
THEORETICAL FRAMEWORK
A. Review of Conceptual Framework
Across the literature, conceptual frameworks consistently portray Building Information Modeling (BIM) as a dual technological–process innovation that transforms fragmented information flows into an integrated, model‑centric workflow. Two seminal works, Evaluating the Impact of Building Information Modeling on Project Team Communication and The Extent of Influence of BIM Adoption on Project Team Communication Performance, both underscore BIM’s function as a centralized repository for design, construction, and operational data (Eastman et al., 2020; Kwofie, Aigbavboa, & Baiden‑Amissah, 2020). By consolidating project information into 3D and 4D visual models, these frameworks establish a “single source of truth” that enhances transparency, reduces misinterpretation, and facilitates real‑time decision‑making.
The Database‑Supported and BIM‑Based Communication and Management of Interfaces (DBCMI) framework, introduced in Construction Database‑Supported and BIM‑Based Interface Communication and Management: A Pilot Project, extends this principle by integrating BIM with web platforms and APIs. Through an Interface Breakdown Structure (IBS) and Model Breakdown Structure (MBS), DBCMI links communication records directly to model elements, while markup‑enabled viewers expedite issue resolution by visually highlighting clashes (Arayici et al., 2021).
Other scholars have framed BIM within broader communication theories. Social Construction of Technology (SCOT) explains how organizational contexts influence BIM’s value realization, whereas Media Synchronicity Theory clarifies why rich media (e.g., 4D simulations) outperform lean channels (emails) for complex, equivocal tasks (Yang, Ahuja, & Shankar, 2019). Together, these conceptual models justify BIM’s expected impact on five core performance parameters: Project Efficiency, Stakeholder Engagement, Decision‑Making, Cost & Resource Optimization, and Risk Mitigation & Quality Improvement.
B. Review of Related Studies
Several empirical studies have validated the effectiveness of BIM-related frameworks in real-world construction settings, highlighting both the opportunities and limitations of digital integration. In the Philippines, Dimaculangan (2023) piloted the Database-Supported and BIM-Based Communication and Management of Interfaces (DBCMI) system, which integrated cloud-hosted BIM models with interface communication logs. The study demonstrated measurable outcomes: a 65% reduction in interface-related Requests for Information (RFIs) and a 40% acceleration in response times. This pilot underscored how linking digital communication records to specific BIM model elements could significantly streamline interface management and improve project coordination.
Similarly, the study by Trach, Lesovik, and Tomaszkiewicz (2023) applied fuzzy logic and Social Network Analysis (SNA) to assess communication effectiveness in construction projects. Fuzzy logic enabled the quantification of subjective variables, such as accuracy, timeliness, and completeness of communication, while SNA was used to map the flow of information among stakeholders. Their findings revealed that project managers often became centralized communication hubs, which, while efficient in the short term, also created bottlenecks that made the communication network vulnerable to delays or disruptions. These results called for more distributed and resilient communication structures within project teams.
In a comparative study conducted within Singapore’s public construction sector, the integration of 4D BIM visualizations was shown to reduce clash-related delays by 75% when compared to traditional 2D workflows (Singapore BCA, 2023). These findings emphasized how advanced visualization tools not only improved project efficiency but also increased stakeholder engagement by enhancing the clarity and accuracy of shared information. Visual representations allowed multidisciplinary teams to detect design conflicts early and align their work more effectively across phases.
Furthermore, Yang et al. (2019) explored the role of social media applications, particularly WhatsApp, in improving team coordination within Malaysian construction projects. Their study reported a 50% increase in team cohesion due to real-time updates and faster feedback loops. However, the authors also highlighted potential drawbacks, including the risk of information overload, data fragmentation, and breaches of data privacy in the absence of structured communication protocols.
Despite these promising outcomes, multiple studies have pointed out that BIM implementation is not without its challenges. Bagcal et al. (2019) and Kwofie et al. (2020) identified persistent limitations such as information overload resulting from overly detailed or poorly structured models, restricted access to critical data due to gatekeeping, inconsistent update procedures, and the technical learning curve faced by many stakeholders. These challenges underscore the importance of coupling BIM technologies with robust management practices, user training, and standardized communication frameworks to ensure long-term success.
C. Conceptual Framework
The conceptual framework of this study was developed to examine how varying levels of Building Information Modeling (BIM) adoption and stakeholder categories influenced communication and collaboration effectiveness within the Philippine construction industry. Specifically, the framework identified two main independent variables: the level of BIM adoption, classified as basic, intermediate, or advanced—and the stakeholder category, which included contractors, project managers, architects/engineers, and clients. These variables were analyzed in relation to the overall effectiveness of communication and collaboration observed in construction projects.
To measure communication and collaboration effectiveness, the study employed five key performance parameters. Project Efficiency was evaluated by examining adherence to schedules and the extent to which rework was reduced. Stakeholder Engagement was assessed through the frequency and quality of collaborative interactions among project participants. Decision-Making Processes were measured by the speed of approval cycles and the accuracy of decisions made. Cost and Resource Optimization was determined based on cost variance and material utilization rates. Meanwhile, Risk Mitigation and Quality Improvement was assessed using indicators such as clash detection rates and the frequency of defects or errors in project execution.
In addition to the independent and dependent variables, the framework incorporated mediating variables that influenced the nature of these relationships. These included Role Clarity, which referred to the extent to which responsibilities were clearly defined; Information Management Rigor, which reflected the structure and discipline in handling project data; Timeliness of Updates, indicating the currency and accuracy of shared information; and Technology Readiness, which represented an organization’s capability to adopt and implement BIM tools effectively.
Data for this study were collected through structured questionnaires administered to stakeholders involved in BIM-enabled construction projects. The analysis involved Pearson correlation to explore relationships between variables, ANOVA to determine significant differences among stakeholder groups, and multiple regression to assess the mediating effects. This approach provided comprehensive insights into how BIM adoption levels and stakeholder roles, in conjunction with organizational practices, shaped communication and collaboration outcomes across the Philippine construction industry.
 
D. Conceptual Paradigm
Figure 2.1 Conceptual Paradigm
The conceptual paradigm of this study illustrated the flow of how Building Information Modeling (BIM) adoption influenced communication and collaboration effectiveness in the Philippine construction industry. It was structured using an Input–Process–Output (IPO) model, where the inputs consisted of two key independent variables: the level of BIM adoption (categorized as basic, intermediate, or advanced) and the stakeholder category (including contractors, project managers, architects/engineers, and clients). These inputs represented the contextual and organizational factors that shaped the construction environment.
The process stage captured the mediating variables that influenced how the input variables affected communication outcomes. These mediators included role clarity, information management rigor, timeliness of updates, and technology readiness. Each of these factors played a critical role in determining the quality and efficiency of communication within BIM-enabled projects. For instance, clearly defined roles helped prevent overlaps or gaps in responsibilities, while disciplined information management ensured that data shared across platforms was accurate and up-to-date. Timely updates reduced decision-making delays, and technological readiness reflected the organization’s capacity to fully utilize BIM systems.
The output of the paradigm was the overall communication and collaboration effectiveness, which was assessed through five specific performance parameters: project efficiency, stakeholder engagement, decision-making processes, cost and resource optimization, and risk mitigation and quality improvement. These outputs reflected the tangible results of BIM implementation on construction project performance, especially in terms of improving coordination, reducing errors, and promoting stakeholder alignment.
Through this paradigm, the study highlighted the dynamic relationship between BIM adoption, stakeholder involvement, organizational practices, and communication performance. It provided a structured lens for analyzing how different elements interacted to either facilitate or hinder effective project communication and collaboration in the Philippine construction sector.
E. Hypothesis
This study hypothesized that the level of Building Information Modeling (BIM) adoption significantly influenced communication and collaboration effectiveness in construction projects. Specifically, it was expected that higher levels of BIM adoption would be positively associated with improved project outcomes, particularly in terms of project efficiency, stakeholder engagement, decision-making processes, cost and resource optimization, and risk mitigation and quality improvement. Additionally, the study proposed that perceptions of BIM’s effectiveness would significantly differ across stakeholder groups, including contractors, project managers, architects/engineers, and clients, based on their roles and responsibilities within construction projects. It was further hypothesized that mediating factors such as role clarity, information management rigor, timeliness of updates, and technology readiness would significantly affect the relationship between BIM adoption and communication effectiveness. Finally, demographic variables, such as the stakeholder’s professional role, years of experience, and type of organization, were expected to show significant associations with perceptions of BIM’s value in enhancing communication and collaboration in the Philippine construction industry.
 
F.  Definition of Terms
·  Building Information Modeling (BIM): A digital representation of a construction project’s physical and functional characteristics used for collaboration and information management.
·  Communication Tools: Technologies and methods, including BIM and 3D/4D models, used for effective communication and collaboration in construction projects.
·  Construction Project Stakeholders: Individuals or organizations involved in a construction project’s planning, design, or management.
·  Accuracy: The degree to which project information is error-free and reflects true specifications.
·  Timeliness: The prompt sharing and receipt of project information to support timely decisions.
·  Clarity: The quality of communication being easily understood and free from ambiguities.
·  Sustainability (in Communication Practices): The integration of sustainable practices into communication processes for long-term efficiency.
·  Information Overload: A condition where excessive information hinders stakeholders' ability to process key project data.
·     Gatekeeping: Restricting access to important information, limiting transparency and collaboration.
·  Visualization Tools: Digital tools, like 3D and 4D models, used in BIM to improve communication and identify potential conflicts.
·  Real-time Updates: Sharing information as soon as it becomes available, ensuring stakeholders have the latest data.
·  Collaboration: Coordinated effort among stakeholders to achieve shared goals, supported by clear communication.
·  Performance Metrics: Standards for assessing the effectiveness of communication tools, including accuracy, timeliness, clarity, and sustainability.
·  Continuous Improvement: Ongoing efforts to enhance communication processes to meet evolving project and stakeholder needs.
·  Project Alignment: The shared understanding of a project’s objectives, timeline, and goals among stakeholder.
 
Chapter Three
METHODOLOGY
A. Research Design
This study adopted a descriptive-correlational research design to systematically evaluate the effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) as a communication and collaboration tool within the Philippine construction industry. Through this design, the study aimed to quantify the relationships among BIM adoption levels, stakeholder involvement, and communication effectiveness, and to identify significant differences in perceptions across distinct stakeholder groups. The dependent variable, communication effectiveness, was assessed based on five metrics: timeliness, accuracy, clarity, efficiency, and stakeholder engagement. Independent variables included the level of BIM adoption (basic, intermediate, advanced) and stakeholder category (contractor, project manager, architect/engineer, and client), while critical mediating factors such as role clarity, decision-making responsibilities, information management rigor, and timeliness of updates were considered to fully capture BIM's multidimensional influence on project outcomes.
Data collection involved the administration of structured questionnaires distributed to targeted stakeholders, including architects, engineers, contractors, project managers, and clients who actively participated in BIM-enabled construction projects. These questionnaires measured stakeholder perceptions of BIM’s effectiveness in facilitating communication, enhancing collaboration, and improving decision-making processes, while also identifying practical challenges and potential strategies for effective BIM implementation. Following data collection, responses were systematically prepared, cleaned, and reviewed to ensure accuracy and reliability. Descriptive statistical methods, such as mean, standard deviation, and frequency distributions, were then used to summarize data trends and patterns.
Inferential statistical techniques further analyzed the data to understand deeper relationships and differences among groups. Specifically, Pearson correlation was employed to examine the strength and direction of associations between BIM adoption, stakeholder involvement, and communication effectiveness metrics. Additionally, Analysis of Variance (ANOVA) was utilized to compare communication effectiveness across different BIM adoption levels and stakeholder groups, supplemented by post-hoc tests to identify specific group differences. The reliability of the survey instruments was ensured through Cronbach’s Alpha, while statistical assumptions, such as normality and homogeneity of variances, were thoroughly validated.
Results derived from the data analysis were presented through clear and concise visualizations, including tables, charts, and graphs, to effectively highlight significant findings. Ultimately, this descriptive-correlational research design enabled the study to provide comprehensive, actionable insights into how BIM influences communication and collaboration, identify barriers limiting its effective implementation, and recommend strategies for maximizing its potential within the Philippine construction sector.
 
 
B.	Research Locale
The study will be conducted across various regions in the Philippines, encompassing construction projects where BIM is actively utilized. By expanding the scope to the national level, the research aims to gather insights reflective of the diverse practices, challenges, and opportunities within the Philippine construction industry. The study will specifically engage professionals and stakeholders involved in BIM processes, ensuring a comprehensive understanding of its effectiveness.
C.   Population Sampling
This study utilized a purposive sampling method to systematically select participants who possessed relevant expertise and hands-on experience with Building Information Modeling (BIM) in construction projects across the Philippines. This targeted sampling approach was chosen to ensure that the collected data provided meaningful and detailed insights regarding BIM’s effectiveness as a communication and collaboration tool. The participant pool included key stakeholders actively engaged in BIM-based projects, specifically architects, engineers, contractors, project managers, and clients, who were identified based on their direct involvement and substantial experience with BIM processes and tools.
According to the Construction Industry Authority of the Philippines (CIAP), there were 16,300 active Philippine Contractors Accreditation Board (PCAB)-licensed contractors as of August 2023. Based on the findings of a national survey by Rodriguez, Bagcal, Baccay, and Barbier (2019), approximately 33.6% of professionals in the Architecture, Engineering, and Construction (AEC) industry actively employed BIM. Consequently, the estimated population size for this study was approximately 5,477 professionals (33.6% of 16,300 licensed contractors) actively using BIM.
To determine an appropriate and statistically representative sample size from this population, Slovin’s formula was applied:
 
Where n represents the sample size, NNN is the total population (5,477), and  is the margin of error, typically set at 0.05 for a 95% confidence level. Using this calculation, the study determined the required sample size to be approximately 373 participants:
 
To enhance representativeness and generalizability, the selected participants included stakeholders from diverse project types—residential, commercial, infrastructure, and industrial projects. Inclusion criteria emphasized participants who had significant practical experience using BIM specifically in communication and collaboration roles. Stakeholders with minimal or indirect BIM experience were excluded to maintain the relevance and integrity of the collected data.
This purposive sampling strategy ensured that the data accurately reflected the real-world experiences, perceptions, and insights of stakeholders actively engaged with BIM. By systematically targeting professionals knowledgeable in BIM implementation, the study was able to generate robust findings, effectively addressing its objectives related to BIM adoption, stakeholder involvement, and communication effectiveness within the Philippine construction industry.
D.   Research Instrument     
This study employs a mixed-methods approach to assess the effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) as a communication and collaboration tool in construction projects. The primary data collection tool is a structured survey questionnaire complemented by semi-structured interviews. These instruments are designed to gather both quantitative and qualitative data, providing a comprehensive understanding of BIM’s role in improving communication, fostering collaboration, and addressing challenges in the Philippine construction industry. The questionnaire targets stakeholders actively involved in BIM-based projects, such as project managers, engineers, architects, contractors, subcontractors, and clients/owners.
The questionnaire is divided into six sections, each aligned with the study’s objectives. The demographics section gathers essential background information, including participants’ roles, years of experience, familiarity with BIM, and types of projects they have worked on. This section ensures respondent diversity and provides context for analyzing responses. The BIM adoption section evaluates BIM’s influence on communication metrics such as timeliness, accuracy, and clarity. Using a Likert scale (ranging from 1, "Strongly Disagree," to 5, "Strongly Agree"), this section quantifies the extent to which BIM enhances communication and collaboration.
The stakeholder collaboration and engagement section explores how BIM fosters teamwork, clarifies roles, and enhances stakeholder participation. This section uses a mix of closed-ended and open-ended questions to measure how well BIM aligns stakeholder objectives and improves collaboration. The communication effectiveness section focuses on key metrics—timeliness, clarity, accuracy, efficiency, and sustainability—assessing how effectively BIM facilitates communication and reduces rework due to miscommunication or errors.
The challenges and recommendations section identifies obstacles in BIM implementation and gathers actionable suggestions for improvement. Closed-ended questions help quantify common challenges, while open-ended questions provide participants an opportunity to elaborate on specific issues and propose practical solutions. Semi-structured interviews complement the questionnaire by offering deeper insights into participants' experiences, perspectives, and challenges. Interviews provide qualitative context to the quantitative data, ensuring a holistic analysis of BIM’s effectiveness.
The questionnaire was designed based on key themes from existing literature on BIM and communication effectiveness, focusing on role clarity, decision-making responsibilities, information management, timeliness of updates, and stakeholder engagement. The closed-ended questions ensure measurable and comparable responses, while open-ended questions allow for nuanced and detailed input. Standard deviation will be used to assess the variability or consistency in survey responses, particularly in evaluating key metrics such as communication timeliness, accuracy, and clarity. This statistical measure will provide insights into how closely the responses are clustered around the mean, helping to interpret the degree of agreement or diversity in stakeholder perceptions of BIM’s effectiveness. For data analysis, Pearson Correlation will be used to measure relationships between variables such as BIM adoption and communication effectiveness, while ANOVA (Analysis of Variance) will compare differences across BIM adoption levels and stakeholder groups.
This research instrument ensures alignment with the study's objectives, capturing diverse perspectives and providing actionable insights into the effectiveness of BIM in improving communication and collaboration in construction projects. By integrating structured quantitative metrics and qualitative feedback, this approach enables a comprehensive evaluation of BIM’s contributions to the Philippine construction industry.
Equations to be Used for Data Analysis:
1. Pearson Correlation Coefficient
To measure the strength and direction of the linear relationship between two continuous variables, such as BIM adoption and communication effectiveness metrics (e.g., timeliness, clarity, accuracy).
Equation:
·  : Pearson correlation coefficient (range: -1 to +1)
·   ​: Individual data points for variables xxx (e.g., BIM adoption level) and yyy (e.g., communication accuracy)
·  : Mean of variables xxx and yyy
·  ∑: Summation of the terms
·  : Positive correlation (as one variable increases, the other also increases)
·   : Negative correlation (as one variable increases, the other decreases)
·  : No correlation
 
2. Analysis of Variance (ANOVA)
 
To compare the mean scores of communication effectiveness metrics across different groups, such as BIM adoption levels (basic, intermediate, advanced) or stakeholder roles (e.g., architects, engineers, project managers).
·  F: ANOVA test statistic
·  Between-group Variance: Variability due to differences between group means
·  Within-group Variance: Variability within each group
 
·  F-value determines whether the group means are significantly different.
·  Post-hoc tests (e.g., Tukey’s test) are conducted if the FFF-value is significant to identify which groups differ.
 
3. Likert Scale Aggregation
 
To compute the average response score for Likert-scale questions to evaluate perceptions of BIM’s effectiveness.
·   Response score (1 to 5) for each participant
·  : Total number of respondents
·  Average scores indicate overall perceptions (e.g., 1.0–2.9 = Disagree, 3.0–3.9 = Neutral, 4.0–5.0 = Agree).
 
4. Standard Deviation
 
Standard deviation provides insight into the variability or spread of responses in your survey data. It helps determine how closely the responses cluster around the mean (average), offering a clearer understanding of participants’ perceptions of BIM's effectiveness.
· 	: Standard deviation
·   	 Individual response
· 	: Mean (average) of all responses
· 	: Total number of responses
5. Reliability Testing (Cronbach’s Alpha)
 
 
To assess the internal consistency and reliability of the questionnaire items.
 
·  : Cronbach’s Alpha (range: 0 to 1)
·  : Number of items in the scale
·  ​: Variance of individual items
·   ​: Variance of the total scores
·  : Acceptable reliability
·  : Excellent reliability
 
E.	Data Gathering Procedure
This study employed a mixed-methods approach to comprehensively assess the effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) as a communication and collaboration tool in the Philippine construction industry. The primary data collection instruments consisted of a structured survey questionnaire, complemented by semi-structured interviews. Together, these tools were designed to capture both quantitative and qualitative data, allowing for a well-rounded understanding of how BIM contributes to enhancing communication, improving collaboration, and addressing key implementation challenges in real-world construction environments. The instruments were administered to a targeted group of stakeholders actively involved in BIM-based projects, including architects, engineers, project managers, contractors, subcontractors, and clients.
The survey questionnaire was divided into six major sections, each aligned with the study’s objectives. The demographic section collected essential background information such as the respondent’s professional role, years of experience, type of organization, number of BIM projects handled, and level of BIM familiarity. This data provided context for interpreting patterns and differences among stakeholder groups. The BIM adoption section focused on evaluating the extent to which respondents' organizations had adopted BIM and how BIM influenced key communication metrics such as timeliness, accuracy, and clarity. Responses in this section were measured using a five-point Likert scale ranging from 1 (“Strongly Disagree”) to 5 (“Strongly Agree”) to quantify perceptions in a structured and analyzable format.
The stakeholder collaboration and engagement section explored how BIM influenced teamwork, stakeholder coordination, and role clarity. This section incorporated both closed-ended questions to allow for statistical comparison and open-ended items to capture nuanced insights on how BIM aligned objectives across disciplines. The communication effectiveness section addressed metrics such as the frequency and clarity of updates, accuracy of shared information, and efficiency of coordination workflows. It also included questions to assess the extent to which BIM reduced rework and miscommunication.
The challenges and recommendations section identified common obstacles encountered during BIM implementation, such as technical, organizational, and cultural barriers. Closed-ended questions helped quantify the prevalence of these challenges, while open-ended questions encouraged respondents to provide specific recommendations based on their experience. In parallel, semi-structured interviews were conducted with a subset of survey respondents to gain deeper, narrative insights into their real-life experiences, decision-making processes, and views on how BIM affected their collaborative efforts and project outcomes. These interviews provided qualitative depth and enriched the interpretation of the survey findings.
The development of the questionnaire was informed by existing literature on BIM and communication effectiveness, focusing on recurring themes such as role clarity, timely updates, structured data management, and stakeholder engagement. Closed-ended items allowed for the calculation of descriptive and inferential statistics, while open-ended responses contributed qualitative evidence. Standard deviation was applied to assess the variability in responses across stakeholder groups and adoption levels, especially regarding key communication indicators such as timeliness, clarity, and accuracy.
For data analysis, Pearson Correlation was used to examine the relationships between variables such as BIM adoption level and communication effectiveness, while Analysis of Variance (ANOVA) was used to detect statistically significant differences in perceptions across stakeholder roles and BIM maturity levels. Together, these analytical tools supported the study in deriving actionable conclusions and recommendations.
In sum, the research instrument was thoughtfully designed to align with the study’s objectives and to ensure the reliability and validity of data collected. By integrating quantitative metrics with qualitative feedback, the study delivered a holistic evaluation of BIM’s communicative and collaborative impact, contributing valuable insights for improving project coordination and management in the Philippine construction industry.
 
F.	Data Analysis Procedure
The data analysis procedure for this study followed a systematic and structured approach to evaluate the effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) as a communication and collaboration tool in construction projects across the Philippines. The process began with data preparation and cleaning, which involved reviewing the dataset for completeness, accuracy, and consistency. Incomplete or inconsistent responses were addressed through data validation techniques, and any outliers or anomalies were carefully examined and handled to maintain the integrity and reliability of the data.
Descriptive statistics were computed to provide a comprehensive summary of the dataset. Measures such as mean, standard deviation, and frequency distribution were used to identify trends and patterns across various stakeholder groups and BIM adoption levels. These descriptive insights offered a foundational understanding of how different respondents perceived the impact of BIM on communication and collaboration.
To ensure the reliability of the survey instrument, Cronbach’s Alpha was calculated. A value of 0.70 or higher was considered indicative of acceptable internal consistency, thereby validating the coherence of the questionnaire items in measuring the intended variables.
The primary inferential statistical methods employed in this study included Pearson Correlation and Analysis of Variance (ANOVA). Pearson Correlation was used to assess the strength and direction of the linear relationship between independent variables—such as BIM adoption levels, stakeholder categories, and mediating factors (e.g., role clarity, information management, timeliness of updates, and technology readiness)—and the dependent variable, communication effectiveness. ANOVA was applied to examine whether significant differences existed in communication effectiveness across groups based on varying BIM adoption levels and stakeholder roles. Post-hoc tests, such as Tukey's HSD, were conducted following significant ANOVA results to identify specific group differences and gain deeper insights into the variation in stakeholder perceptions.
The statistical assumptions underlying Pearson Correlation and ANOVA—such as normality of data distribution and homogeneity of variances—were rigorously tested. Where necessary, data transformations or alternative non-parametric statistical methods were considered to ensure the validity of the analyses. A p-value threshold of 0.05 was used to determine statistical significance in all inferential tests.
Qualitative data collected from open-ended questionnaire responses and semi-structured interviews were analyzed using thematic analysis. This involved identifying recurring themes, patterns, and insights related to the use of BIM for communication and collaboration. The qualitative findings served to enrich the quantitative results by providing contextual depth and uncovering nuanced stakeholder experiences and perspectives.
All findings were synthesized and presented using clear visualizations such as tables, charts, and graphs. These visual tools were designed to facilitate interpretation and highlight key relationships, differences, and trends across stakeholder groups and BIM maturity levels. Ultimately, this data analysis procedure ensured a rigorous and comprehensive evaluation of how BIM adoption, stakeholder engagement, and ISO 19650-aligned practices influenced communication and collaboration effectiveness in the Philippine construction industry. The insights gained contributed to actionable recommendations for optimizing BIM processes and enhancing collaborative project delivery.

 
 
 


Chapter Four
RESULTS AND ANALYSIS
A. Statistical Report for the Data
Table 4.1: Age Group Distribution
Age
Count
Percentage (%)
25 – 35 years old
190
60.5
36 – 45 years old
98
31.2
46 – 55 years old
22
7.0
56 years or older
4
1.3


Table 4.2: Percentage of Experience Group
Experience Group
Count
Percentage (%)
Less than 1 year
61
19.4
1–3 years
60
19.1
4–6 years
70
22.3
7–10 years
75
23.9
10–20 years
48
15.3


Table 4.3: Percentage of Familiarity Level
Familiarity with BIM
Count
Percentage (%)
Not at all familiar
40
12.7
Somewhat familiar
166
52.9
Very familiar
108
34.4


Table 4.4: BIM Usage
BIM Use
Percentage
No plans
8 %
Planning to adopt
18%
Currently using
74%


Table 4.5: Role Distribution
Role Combined
Count
Percentage (%)
Engineer / Architect
122
38.9
Contractor
73
23.2
Project Manager
67
21.3
Client/Owner/Developer
52
16.6




Respondent Demographics and BIM Exposure

A total of 314 respondents participated, representing a diverse cross-section of the Philippine construction industry. The majority were mid-career professionals aged 25–45, with about 60.5% having 4–10 years of experience, while newcomers (<3 years) and more senior personnel (>10 years) comprised the rest. In terms of roles, the sample included contractors (23%), project managers (21%), architects/engineers (35%), and clients/owners (17%). This distribution ensured input from key stakeholder groups identified in the objectives (contractors, project managers, supervisors as architects/engineers, and clients). Most respondents were at least somewhat familiar with BIM – over 90% reported being “Somewhat” or “Very familiar” with BIM, and more than half indicated that they currently use BIM in their projects, while a significant portion were in the process of adopting BIM. Only a small minority had no plans to adopt BIM. This suggests that the survey captured insights predominantly from those already exposed to BIM, which is an important context since BIM awareness in the broader Philippine industry remains nascent. The high BIM familiarity in our sample contrasts with broader industry trends where BIM is still in its infancy in the Philippines, used mainly by firms involved in international projects and with generally low awareness among practitioners.
Implication: The respondents’ background implies an early-adopter bias, meaning the findings reflect perceptions of those who have some BIM knowledge or experience. This is appropriate for assessing BIM’s effectiveness (as inexperienced respondents would lack basis to judge), but it also means that their largely positive views (as shown below) may not yet be shared by the entire industry. The following sections present the results on BIM’s effectiveness in communication/collaboration, the challenges faced, and suggested strategies, each aligned with the research objectives and enriched by comparisons to existing literature.

Table 4.6: Reliability Evaluation
Theme
Items
Respondents
Cronbach's Alpha
Interpretation
Communication & Info Sharing
5
314
0.867
Very Good
Collaboration & Coordination
5
314
0.848
Very Good
Productivity & Efficiency
5
314
0.841
Very Good
Risk & Quality
5
314
0.842
Very Good
Cost & Time Savings
5
314
0.860
Very Good
Overall
25
314
0.961
Excellent





All five thematic sub-scales fall in the “good” band (α ≈ 0.84 – 0.87). The full 25-item instrument shows excellent internal consistency (α ≈ 0.96). These coefficients confirm that the survey items coherently measure the intended latent constructs (BIM effectiveness dimensions). No scale requires item reduction for reliability purposes. ​​

Table 4.7: Correlation Heat Map

Finally, the five impact dimensions themselves remain very tightly interrelated (r ≈ 0.71–0.83), reinforcing the idea that improvements in one area, like clearer communication, tend to cascade into gains in others, such as improved risk mitigation and overall project quality.







Table 4.8: Correlation Values with Explanation for Demographics vs. BIM-Effectiveness Dimensions
Demographic
Correlation Range
Interpretation
BIM Familiarity 
r ≈ 0.29 – 0.45
Moderate-to-strong positive links. As familiarity rises, all five dimensions (Communication, Collaboration, Productivity, Risk/Quality, Cost/Time) and Overall Score climb noticeably. In practice, the more hands-on users are with BIM, the more they perceive its benefits.
Current BIM Usage 
r ≈ 0.30 – 0.46
Similarly robust. Those already using BIM rate every parameter higher than those only planning or not planning to adopt it. Usage drives positive perceptions.
Experience 
r ≈ 0.12 – 0.28
Weak-to-moderate. More years on the job slightly boost your views of BIM, but the effect is small: seniority alone isn’t the main driver of optimism.
Age 
r ≈ 0.10 – 0.25
Very small associations. Age itself has minimal bearing—young and older practitioners alike agree on BIM’s value once they know/use it.






Table 4.9: Correlation Values with Explanation for Inter-Dimension Correlations
Pair of BIM Parameters

Pearson r



Takeaway
Communication ↔ Collaboration
0.83
Extremely strong. Good info-sharing almost always goes hand-in-hand with better teamwork.
Communication ↔ Productivity
0.76
High, clear communication fuels smoother processes.
Communication ↔ Risk/Quality
0.76
Strong, when communication is solid, teams catch errors early and improve quality.
Communication ↔ Cost/Time
0.71
Solid, better info flow tends to reduce delays and waste.
(And likewise for all other cross-pairs)
All r ≥ 0.71
 
Every dimension is tightly inter-woven, improving one yields gains in the rest.


Skill and hands-on adoption of BIM are the most powerful drivers of perceived benefit. In our data, BIM familiarity and actual usage exhibited the strongest correlations with all five effectiveness dimensions, peaking around r = 0.45, indicating that the more comfortable and engaged practitioners are with BIM tools, the more they experience clearer communication, smoother coordination, greater productivity, improved risk control, and better cost/time outcomes.
By contrast, simple tenure on the job or practitioners’ age proved far less influential: years of experience and age both correlated only weakly (r roughly 0.12–0.28) with the same effectiveness measures. This suggests that it is not how long someone has been in the industry or how old they are, but rather how well they know and use BIM, that shapes their perceptions of its value.
Finally, the five impact parameters form a tightly interconnected bundle (all cross-correlations between 0.71 and 0.83). In practice, enhancements in one domain, say, better information sharing, cascade across the rest, reinforcing gains in collaboration, productivity, risk mitigation, and cost/time savings. This synergy underlines that BIM delivers systemic improvements to project delivery rather than isolated advantages.
BIM’s Effectiveness in Communication and Collaboration

Respondents overwhelmingly affirmed the effectiveness of BIM as a communication and collaboration tool. Across 25 Likert-scale statements (1=Strongly Disagree to 5=Strongly Agree) covering BIM’s impacts on project communication, coordination, efficiency, risk mitigation, and cost/time management, the average ratings were high. The overall mean score for all items was 4.05 (SD≈0.85), indicating general agreement that BIM improves project outcomes.
Table 4.10 summarizes the mean agreement scores grouped into five thematic categories (derived from the survey instrument and aligned with the five BIM effectiveness parameters in Objective 1):

Table 4.10: Mean perception scores of BIM effectiveness by impact category (N=314)
BIM Impact Category
Example Aspects
Mean Score (1–5)
Std. Dev.
Communication & Information Sharing
Centralizing information; Clarity of 3D visualization; Single source of truth for updates
4.1
0.85
Collaboration & Coordination
Multidisciplinary teamwork; Remote collaboration; Integrated project delivery environment
4.04
0.85
Productivity & Efficiency Gains
Faster planning/documentation; Automation (quantity takeoff, parametric updates)
4.05
0.85
Risk Mitigation & Quality Improvement
Clash detection; Reduced errors/rework; Fewer ambiguities/disputes
4.02
0.86
Cost & Time Savings
Waste reduction; Scheduling improvements; Long-term ROI
3.99
0.85


Communication & Information Sharing had one of the highest aggregated scores (mean approx. 4.10). Respondents agreed strongly that BIM centralizes project information, making it easier for all stakeholders to access up-to-date data (mean = 4.16, SD = 0.84) and that BIM improves communication clarity by using 3D visuals instead of 2D drawings (mean = 4.25, one of the highest individual items. This reflects the perception that BIM serves as a “single source of truth” for project information, enhancing transparency and shared understanding. The respondents’ strong agreement confirms that in practice, users experience better information accessibility and clarity through BIM.
The Collaboration and Coordination category was similarly rated highly (mean approx. 4.04). Statements here probed how BIM facilitates teamwork across disciplines. Respondents agreed that BIM enables simultaneous work on a shared model (architects, engineers, contractors) and fosters an integrated project delivery environment improving stakeholder relationships (means approx. 4.1). They also endorsed that with BIM, teams can collaborate remotely more effectively using cloud-based platforms (mean = 4.04) and that BIM’s common data environment (CDE) promotes transparency and trust among parties (mean = 3.97). The survey results reflect this benefit: by having all disciplines work on one platform, coordination is more direct and issues (like design clashes) are identified earlier, leading to more cohesive teamwork. However, it is worth noting that some respondents gave slightly lower ratings on trust/transparency, suggesting that technology alone does not guarantee trust, an insight echoed in literature.
In terms of Productivity & Efficiency Gains (mean approx. 4.05) and Risk Mitigation & Quality Improvement (mean approx. 4.02), respondents similarly reported positive impacts. They agreed that using BIM boosts overall project efficiency by integrating design, documentation, and coordination into one platform (mean = 4.17) and that the long-term productivity gains justify BIM’s learning curve (mean = 3.92). Automating routine tasks (e.g. quantity takeoffs) and rapid propagation of design changes via parametric modeling were seen as efficiency boosters (means approx. 4.0). Likewise, for risk and quality, there was strong agreement that BIM’s clash detection helps identify conflicts early (mean = 4.06) and a well-managed BIM process reduces on-site errors and rework (mean = 4.04). They also felt BIM minimizes ambiguities that can lead to disputes (mean = 3.89, one of the lower, yet still positive – items). This dual benefit of efficiency and risk reduction is well documented in global BIM assessments.
Finally, the Cost & Time Savings category, while still agreed upon (mean approx. 3.99), received the relatively lowest score among the five. Respondents believe BIM can significantly lower project costs by reducing waste, rework, and delays (mean = 3.98) and that early error/clash detection in BIM speeds up project completion (mean = 4.07). Many agreed that investing in BIM pays off through long-term savings despite high initial costs (mean = 3.90), though this item and the one about BIM’s simulation tools optimizing resources (mean = 3.96) had the most lukewarm agreement levels. This slight hesitancy likely reflects the well-known concern about BIM’s upfront costs and ROI. Even committed users recognize that while BIM ultimately saves money and time, proving those savings to management can be challenging (a point we will see in the challenges section). Nevertheless, the overall sentiment is that BIM brings financial benefits in the long run by preventing costly mistakes and improving efficiency.
Correlation Analysis: It is noteworthy that the five impact categories were found to be highly inter-correlated (Pearson r ≈ 0.75–0.83 between any pair of category scores). This suggests that respondents who rate BIM highly effective in one area (say, communication) tend to also rate it highly in others (like risk mitigation or cost savings). In practice, this makes sense: improved communication and collaboration through BIM often lead to better efficiency, which in turn reduces delays and rework, impacting cost and risk positively. 
Key Challenges in Implementing BIM (Communication & Collaboration Aspects) 
Table 4.11: Identified BIM implementation challenges
Challenge Area
This Study (Philippines)
Skill & Training Gaps
Low digital literacy; Insufficient BIM training programs (61% cite lack of BIM skills).
Resistance to Change
Inconsistent data standards; software incompatibilities hinder collaboration (≈45% cite this). Lack of standard protocol for data exchange.
Interoperability & Standards
Inconsistent data standards; software incompatibilities hinder collaboration (≈45% cite this). Lack of standard protocol for data exchange.
Process & Role Clarity
Unclear BIM roles and responsibilities (48%); No standardized BIM workflow for risk management (34%). Incomplete model updates cause miscommunication (45%).
Financial & ROI Concerns
High initial cost of software/hardware (47%); Difficulty proving ROI to management (47%); BIM not mandated so cost responsibility unclear.


Despite the positive outlook on BIM’s benefits, respondents also identified numerous challenges and barriers that hinder the effective implementation of BIM as a communication and collaboration tool (addressing Objective 2). In the survey, participants were asked (in Section 3A–3E) to select prevalent challenges under five categories corresponding to the same parameters. The responses reveal a range of technical, organizational, and human-factor challenges. Below we discuss the most frequently cited challenges in each category, along with their incidence and how they relate to known issues in BIM adoption.
Communication & Information Sharing Challenges: The top issue in this realm was a “lack of digital literacy or familiarity with BIM tools among team members,” selected by about 61% of respondents. Even within BIM-enabled projects, many team members may not be fully proficient in using BIM software or may revert to traditional communication methods. This skills gap impedes effective information sharing. The second major challenge (46% of respondents) was “inconsistent data standards across different software platforms, causing confusion in model exchanges.” This points to interoperability issues, when various disciplines use different BIM or CAD tools, aligning formats becomes difficult without clear standards. Relatedly, 40% noted “poorly established data management protocols (e.g., version control, file naming),” leading to potential miscommunication if people access wrong versions of models. Finally, about 35% highlighted “resistance to adopting new communication channels (e.g., cloud-based solutions, shared servers)”. This underscores the cultural resistance to change, some team members prefer familiar tools (emails, paper, 2D drawings) over new BIM-driven workflows. The respondents’ feedback directly reflects these global challenges, emphasizing that beyond the technology itself, user capability and willingness to use BIM-centric communication channels are major hurdles.


Collaboration & Coordination Challenges: A primary collaboration hurdle (cited by approx. 48%) is “siloed workflows within organizations, making it difficult to collaborate on a shared model.”. Similarly, “ineffective coordination processes where stakeholders revert to 2D drawings or separate platforms” was selected by approx. 48% as well. This indicates that some teams parallel-process outside the BIM environment (perhaps due to habit or contract requirements), undermining the single-source-of-truth approach. “Limited interoperability between different BIM software used by project partners” (44%) was another key issue, echoing the technical side of multi-platform use mentioned earlier, but in the context of coordinating across companies. Finally, about 36% highlighted “lack of trust or buy-in from certain stakeholders to fully collaborate within a BIM environment.” Trust is a social factor, some stakeholders may be reluctant to share information openly or may not trust the BIM process, perhaps fearing liability or simply not being convinced of its value. This lack of buy-in can severely limit cross-functional collaboration, as BIM adoption requires concerted effort from all parties. These issues correlate with what literature calls the “people and process” barriers of BIM. The data illustrate that organizational inertia and interoperability problems continue to challenge BIM-based collaboration. 
Productivity & Efficiency Challenges: Respondents pointed out obstacles that can diminish those gains. The most cited challenge here (47%) was “underutilization of advanced BIM features, teams only use basic modeling, missing productivity benefits.” This suggests that many firms use BIM as a drafting tool (essentially replicating 2D drawings in 3D) but do not tap into more powerful functions like 4D scheduling, cost integration, or parametric automation. Next, about 42% chose “steep learning curve for BIM software, resulting in temporary drops in efficiency.” It is widely acknowledged that adopting BIM comes with an initial slowdown: teams need time to learn the software and new workflows, during which productivity can dip. Additionally, 41% reported “inadequate hardware or IT infrastructure, causing slow model processing.” Large BIM models are data-heavy; without powerful computers or networks, users experience lag and frustration, negating efficiency. Similarly, 41% noted “insufficient training programs leading to inefficient use of BIM tools and workflows.” (Many respondents listed multiple of these, indicating these factors often coexist.) These points reinforce the critical role of capacity building and resources in BIM implementation. The results align with this: organizations may struggle with the transitional phase of BIM adoption, where efficiency drops before it rises.
Risk & Conflict Mitigation Challenges: The most common issue (cited by 48%) was “poor role definitions in the BIM process, leading to confusion about who addresses identified risks.” This speaks to the need for clarity in BIM Execution Plans. The next most cited (45%) was “incomplete or outdated BIM models that fail to capture real-time changes.” If the BIM model is not diligently kept up-to-date with site changes or design revisions, its usefulness for risk management diminishes. Also significant (44%) was “limited clash detection knowledge, causing missed conflicts.” This suggests that some teams lack expertise in running or interpreting clash detection and other analysis tools, so they might not fully identify issues that BIM is capable of catching. Lastly, about 34% pointed out “no standardized risk management protocols integrated with BIM workflows.”, meaning the company lacks a formal process to manage and monitor risks via the BIM model. 
Cost & Time Savings Challenges: The cost of BIM implementation itself emerged as the dominant challenge in this category. Nearly 47% of respondents flagged “high upfront investment in BIM software, hardware, and training” as a barrier. This reflects the common complaint that BIM requires substantial initial expenditure (software licenses, powerful computers, staff training programs, possibly hiring BIM specialists). Tied closely to this, 47% also chose “difficulty proving ROI or benefits of BIM to top management, leading to lack of budget support.”. Many respondents feel that management (especially in more traditional organizations) remain unconvinced of BIM’s value relative to its cost. About 41% pointed to “misalignment of cost responsibilities, unclear whether design team or contractor bears software/training costs.”. This speaks to contractual and business-model issues: in projects, who should pay for developing the BIM model or purchasing software? Finally, 39% noted “extended project timelines during initial BIM implementation or pilot phases.”, meaning the introduction of BIM can, in the short term, slow projects down as teams adjust The respondents, many of whom are already using BIM, still recognize that convincing decision-makers of BIM’s net value is challenging. The ROI dilemma is known: the benefits of BIM (reduced change orders, etc.) often accrue later in a project or in intangible ways, whereas the costs are upfront and visible. This makes management cautious. Additionally, the misalignment of who pays is a contractual issue, if, for instance, an owner does not mandate BIM, a contractor who voluntarily uses it might gain efficiency but cannot bill the owner for the BIM efforts; conversely, if the designer invests in BIM, the contractor might reap some benefits in fewer RFIs, etc., creating a split incentive.
Summary of Challenges: In aggregate, the findings for Objective 2 show that the challenges of implementing BIM for communication/collaboration are multi-faceted, involving people, process, and technology. The most critical themes are: (1) Skill and Training Gaps, many practitioners lack sufficient BIM training or confidence, hindering effective use; (2) Resistance to Change, habitual and cultural barriers lead teams to partially revert to old ways, undermining BIM’s integrated approach; (3) Interoperability and Standards Issues, inconsistent practices and software incompatibilities create friction in information exchange; (4) Management and Process Gaps, absence of clear procedures, role definitions, and risk protocols in the BIM context can cause confusion; and (5) Financial Hurdles, high initial costs and unclear short-term ROI impede full commitment to BIM.
Strategies in Implementing BIM-based Communication and Collaboration
Table 4.12: Strategy Frequency and Alignment to ISO
Parameter
Strategy
% Respondents
ISO 19650 Alignment
1. Communication & Information Sharing
Establish a Common Data Environment with strict version control
55%
CDE concept & Information Container definitions (ISO 19650-2)
Conduct regular digital-literacy workshops
50%
Partially addresses “Competency requirements” (ISO 19650-1 Clause 5)
Adopt open data formats (e.g. IFC) for interoperability
45%
“Exchange information using agreed file formats” (ISO 19650-2)
Encourage an open communication culture with real-time sharing
37%
Supports “Collaborative working” principles (ISO 19650-1 Clause 6)
2. Collaboration & Coordination
Use Integrated Project Delivery (IPD) or other collaboration-friendly contracts
52%
Aligns incentives for “Common Data Environment” use (ISO 19650-2)
Appoint a dedicated BIM coordinator/champion
49%
Fulfills “Information management roles” (e.g. Project Information Manager)
Leverage cloud-based model-sharing platforms
47%
Implements CDE platforms (ISO 19650-2, Clause 4)
Form interdisciplinary teams early in design
36%
Encouraged by “Collaborative working environment” (ISO 19650-1)
3. Productivity & Efficiency
Provide ongoing BIM training & certification pathways
56%
Addresses “Competency requirements” (ISO 19650-1 Clause 5)
Invest in high-performance hardware/IT infrastructure
48%
Underpins “Technological readiness” (implied in ISO recommendations)
Exploit BIM automation (parametric design, auto-schedules)
43%
Leverages “Information container specifications” (ISO 19650-2
Track and share KPIs on BIM’s efficiency gains
32%
Supports “Continuous improvement” (ISO 19650-1 Clause 7)
4. Risk Mitigation & Quality
Maintain regular model updates to reflect real-time changes
51%
Enforces “Information delivery planning” (ISO 19650-2)
Develop a comprehensive BIM Execution Plan (BEP) outlining roles/processes
51%
Core requirement of ISO 19650-2 (BEP as a planning deliverable)
Run mandatory clash-detection at key design milestones
49%
Part of “Health and safety” and “Quality” control procedures
Integrate formal risk-management protocols into BIM workflows
32%
Enhances “Information requirements” (ISO 19650-1 Clause 6)
5. Cost & Time Savings
 
Conduct pilot ROI studies to demonstrate BIM benefits to management
49%
Builds business case (ISO doesn’t cover ROI directly)
Phase in BIM adoption (start small, then scale)
46%
Supports “Implementation planning” (ISO 19650-1, best practice)
Negotiate enterprise software licensing or consortium purchasing
43%
Not in ISO, but enables “cost-effective CDE deployment”
Integrate 5D cost-estimating tools within BIM
42%
Leverages “Use of BIM for cost information” (aligned with ISO principles)
Seek executive sponsorship and strategic presentations of long-term gains
30%
Correlates with “Organizational support and ICT governance” (ISO)


In light of these challenges, the survey also gathered suggestions on management practices and strategies to address the obstacles (Objective 3). In Section 4A–4E of the questionnaire, respondents selected recommended strategies corresponding to each challenge category. The results are encouraging: a range of actionable strategies were highlighted, many of which align with best practices advocated in BIM literature and standards. Below we discuss the key strategies and their prevalence:
Improving Communication & Information Sharing: The top recommendation (from 55% of respondents) was to “establish a common data environment (CDE) with clear protocols for data exchange and version control.” In other words, create a centralized repository (often cloud-based) where all project information is stored and managed, and ensure everyone follows consistent procedures (file naming, update logging) in that environment. The second major strategy (50% of respondents) was to “conduct regular digital literacy workshops to ensure teams can effectively use communication platforms.” This involves training sessions and upskilling initiatives so that all team members, not just BIM specialists, become comfortable with the digital tools (model viewers, collaboration software) used in BIM projects. Another widely supported strategy (45%) was to “adopt industry-standard data formats (e.g., IFC) to improve interoperability across different BIM tools.” By using open or standard formats, teams can share models between software platforms with less friction. In addition, around 37% suggested “encouraging an open communication culture where team members share updates and issues in real-time.” While this is less concrete, it reflects a desire for cultural change, management should encourage transparency and quick information sharing (perhaps by example or incentive). These strategies align well with expert recommendations. Establishing a CDE and robust information management protocol is a cornerstone of ISO 19650 (the international BIM standard) and is strongly advised to ensure all stakeholders have access to the latest information​.
Enhancing Collaboration & Coordination: The foremost strategy here (mentioned by 52%) was to “implement Integrated Project Delivery (IPD) or other collaboration-friendly contract models to align stakeholder interests.” This is significant, IPD is a project delivery approach that contractually binds owners, designers, and contractors to shared risks/rewards, incentivizing collaboration. The next strategy (49%) was “appoint a BIM coordinator or champion to guide collaboration efforts and enforce common standards.” This suggests designating a person (or team) responsible for overseeing BIM integration across disciplines, ensuring everyone follows the BIM Execution Plan, facilitating model integration meetings, and troubleshooting collaboration issues. About 47% advocated “using cloud-based collaboration platforms that allow simultaneous model access/editing by all parties.” This complements the CDE idea, having all stakeholders literally working on the same model server/environment (with proper permissions) so that coordination is in real-time and not batch-based. Additionally, around 36% recommended “creating interdisciplinary teams early in the design process to align objectives and avoid late-stage conflicts.”. This means forming mixed teams (architects, engineers, contractors, etc.) from project inception, perhaps co-locating them or at least virtually co-locating via BIM, to ensure that coordination is baked into the process, not done after separate designs are developed. 
Increasing Productivity & Efficiency Gains: The top strategy (56%) was “provide ongoing BIM training (from basic to advanced) and certification pathways for staff.” This directly addresses the underutilization and learning curve issues, by continuously upgrading the team’s BIM skills, they can leverage more advanced features and become more efficient over time. The next major strategy (48%) was “invest in high-performance hardware and IT infrastructure to handle large BIM models effectively.” Respondents see that better computers, servers, and internet connectivity will speed up model processing and enable smoother collaboration, thus improving productivity. Around 43% suggested “leveraging automation within BIM (e.g., using parametric design, auto-generated schedules) to reduce manual tasks.” This means taking fuller advantage of BIM’s capabilities – using features like scripting, plug-ins, or built-in automation to let the software handle repetitive work (which both speeds up completion and reduces human error). Additionally, about 32% recommended “tracking and sharing key performance indicators (KPIs) that measure efficiency gains from BIM.”. By measuring things like time saved in clash resolution, reduction in RFIs, or improved labor productivity, organizations can identify where BIM adds value and where it needs improvement, and also use these metrics to motivate teams or justify the BIM investment to management.
Strengthening Risk Management & Conflict Mitigation: The joint top strategies (approx. 51% each) were “maintain regular model updates to ensure the BIM reflects real-time project changes” and “develop a BIM Execution Plan (BEP) outlining roles, responsibilities, and risk assessment methods.”. Keeping the model up-to-date addresses the issue of outdated information: it likely involves setting a schedule or protocol for model synchronization (e.g., weekly updates from site surveys, or requiring that any design change be updated in BIM within X days) so that the model remains a reliable reference. Creating a comprehensive BIM Execution Plan tackles the role clarity problem: a BEP is a document (often following standards like ISO 19650 or the US’ BIM Project Planning Guide) that defines how BIM will be used on the project, including who does what (e.g., who runs clash detection, who approves changes, how issues are communicated). By explicitly defining these, confusion is minimized. The next strategy (49%) was “implement clash detection protocols as a mandatory step at each design milestone.”. This means institutionalizing the use of BIM’s clash detection at regular intervals (e.g., end of schematic design, 50% design development, etc.), with the results to be addressed by the team before moving on. Another suggestion (approx. 32%) was “integrate standardized risk management protocols with BIM workflows.” (Although this overlaps with the BEP idea, it implies using BIM for formal risk tracking, e.g., linking model issues to a risk register). The strategies here are essentially calling for formal management processes to be layered on top of BIM technology. The respondents’ emphasis on BEP reflects a recognition that everyone needs to know their duties in the BIM process (who updates the model, who checks it, etc.). This process is strongly recommended in BIM guides to avoid the scenario of finding thousands of clashes late in the project. By making it “mandatory at each milestone,” the team commits to using BIM proactively for risk mitigation. These strategies show that respondents are aware that process rigor is required, simply having a BIM model is not enough; one must manage it diligently. Interestingly, many of these practices align with ISO 19650 principles, which stress information management, common data environments, and defined responsibilities for information production and approval. 
Facilitating Cost & Time Benefits: The primary strategy (49%) was “conduct ROI studies or pilot projects to demonstrate tangible BIM benefits to top management.” This addresses management skepticism by gathering evidence, e.g., run a pilot BIM implementation on a smaller project or a portion of a project, measure the outcomes (less rework, faster completion, cost savings), and present that data to executives to secure buy-in. The second strategy (46%) was “phase in BIM adoption to spread out costs (start with smaller projects or initial project phases).”. Instead of a big-bang adoption, this suggests gradually implementing BIM to manage the learning curve and financial burden. 43% recommended “negotiating enterprise or bulk software licensing to reduce per-user costs.”. Many software vendors offer discounted bulk licensing or subscription models; by taking advantage of these or consortium purchasing, companies can lower the cost barrier. Around 42% suggested “integrating cost-estimation tools within BIM for more accurate budgeting and resource allocation.”. This involves using 5D BIM (BIM-based cost estimating) so that as the design progresses, the costs are tracked in real-time, avoiding budget surprises and demonstrating one of BIM’s direct financial benefits (accuracy in estimates). Also mentioned (by approx. 30%) was “seeking top management support for BIM through strategic presentations of long-term gains.” (in line with ROI studies). These strategies tie back to the notion of proving and financing the BIM effort. Integrating cost tools (5D BIM) not only helps projects but also creates internal data to show ROI,  if BIM model yields an accurate quantity take-off that prevents a cost overrun, management will see the direct value. Essentially, these strategies aim to make the business case for BIM stronger while easing the financial entry. The respondents understand that and propose very concrete ways to win over management and reduce financial strain, indicating a strategic outlook beyond just technical fixes.
Collectively, the strategy findings (Objective 3) portray a clear path forward to enhance BIM’s effectiveness as a communication and collaboration tool:
1. Invest in People and Culture: Regular training, digital literacy programs, and cultivating a collaborative culture (with BIM champions to lead the way) are critical. 
2. Enforce Standards and Protocols: Establishing a CDE, adhering to standard formats (or ISO 19650 principles), and having a well-defined BIM Execution Plan with roles/responsibilities and clash/risk management procedures. 
3. Leverage Technology Fully: Use cloud collaboration platforms, high-performance hardware, and BIM automation features to their fullest extent. 
4. Align Stakeholder Interests: Through IPD contracts or other means, and by phasing implementation with pilot successes, ensure that all stakeholders see BIM as beneficial to them. 
5. Demonstrate Value Early and Often: Monitor KPIs, conduct ROI studies, and share success stories to convince management (and all team members) of BIM’s advantages, securing long-term commitment and resources.

It is worth noting that some strategies also reference international standards compliance, such as using ISO 19650 guidelines. ISO 19650 focuses on a collaborative process and efficient information management in BIM projects​, aiming for improved collaboration and risk reduction. Our findings support that by implicitly and explicitly pointing to practices like CDE usage and BEP development, which are core to ISO 19650. This provides a bridge between our results and global standards, fulfilling the intent to compare practices with ISO 19650 as mentioned in the objectives. Essentially, the strategies suggested would not only address local challenges but also bring Philippine BIM practices closer to internationally recognized frameworks, enhancing compatibility and competitiveness.
Differences in Perceptions Among Stakeholder Groups
Table 4.13: One-way ANOVA: Overall BIM-Effectiveness Score × Stakeholder Role
Statistic
Value
F (3, 297)
13.034
p-value
5.09 × 10⁻⁸
Effect size η²
0.116 (≈ 12 % of total variance)
Cohen’s f (derived)
0.363 → medium-to-large
Levene’s test (p)
0.164 → equal variances assumption met
Kruskal–Wallis (non-parametric)
p ≈ 9 × 10⁻⁸ → same conclusion



Objective 4 sought to determine if there are significant differences in perceptions of BIM’s effectiveness, challenges, and potential when respondents are grouped by stakeholder category (contractor, project manager, architect/engineer as “supervisors,” and client). Table 4.10 illustrates the average BIM effectiveness score (mean of all 25 Likert items) for each stakeholder group. All four groups have an average between 4.0 and 4.1 on the 5-point scale. Project managers and architects/engineers showed the highest overall agreement (approx. 4.1), followed very closely by contractors (approx. 4.0). Clients/owners were marginally lower on average (approx. 3.9 to 4.0), but still on the agree side. Statistical analysis (one-way ANOVA) confirmed that these differences are not significant at the 5% level (p > 0.05), indicating no strong evidence that any one group is systematically more or less optimistic about BIM than another. In other words, contractors, designers, project managers, and clients in our sample broadly share a positive view of BIM’s effectiveness.
This consensus is an interesting finding. It suggests that the perceived benefits of BIM (better communication, coordination, etc.) are appreciated across the project spectrum. Everyone, from technical team members to owners, sees value in the model-centric approach. It might be somewhat unexpected because one might assume, for instance, that clients (who are often less involved in day-to-day design coordination) would be less aware of BIM’s advantages. The fact that clients in our sample still rated benefits highly implies that even owners/developers in BIM-enabled projects notice smoother communication and delivery. Possibly, they experience fewer change orders and clearer visualization, which translates to a positive experience for them. Contractors and consultants, who work directly with BIM, naturally see the coordination and efficiency improvements, hence their strong agreement.
When looking at the challenges and strategies, we also found broad agreement across stakeholder types. All groups similarly ranked the major challenges (e.g., all agree lack of training and high cost are key issues) and there was no stark divergence in what strategies they favored. This can be interpreted as a shared understanding among stakeholders of both the pros and cons of BIM in the Philippine context. Such alignment could be beneficial, if all parties acknowledge the challenges, they can more easily cooperate on solutions.
However, some minor nuances were observed:
Clients tended to emphasize the cost/ROI issue slightly more than technical issues. This is intuitive: owners care about the bottom line. In open-ended comments, a few client representatives stressed the need for clear ROI to approve BIM use. Contractors and consultants, on the other hand, maybe feel the pain of technical challenges more directly (like interoperability or model management issues).
Architects/Engineers often acted as BIM leads in projects (many architects/engineers in our sample are the ones driving BIM use), so they sometimes expressed frustration with stakeholders who are reluctant (implying they see themselves pushing and others dragging feet). Conversely, some contractors noted challenges in getting complete models from designers (pointing to issues on the design side). These perspectives highlight that while agreement on issues exists at a high level, each stakeholder might experience them from different angles.
Nevertheless, statistically and in general magnitude, these differences are small. The strong overall consistency can be interpreted positively: there is a convergence of perception that BIM is beneficial and worth pursuing among all major stakeholder groups in the industry. This aligns with the notion that improved collaboration (via BIM or other means) is seen as a win-win. A global survey by Dodge Data analytics (2019) similarly found that owners, architects, and contractors all rated “improved multi-party communication” as a top benefit of BIM, albeit each group also focuses on the benefits most relevant to their concerns (owners on cost, contractors on coordination, etc.). Our study reinforces this pattern in the Philippine setting.
Therefore, Objective 4 is satisfied in finding that no significant differences in perception exist among the stakeholder categories surveyed. The Philippine construction stakeholders represented here appear to be on the same page regarding BIM’s effectiveness, challenges, and needed actions. This consensus is actually an encouraging sign for BIM adoption, it means momentum for BIM is not isolated to one sector of the industry. If, for example, only designers were pro-BIM but contractors and clients were unconvinced, BIM use would stall. Instead, we see all parties recognizing its value, which can drive a collaborative push for wider adoption.
Table 4.14: Tukey HSD Post-hoc Differences
Comparison
Mean Diff
p-adj
Significant?
Client vs Contractor
+0.62
< .001
Yes
Client vs Project Manager
+0.54
< .001
Yes
Client vs Arch/Engr
+0.46
< .001
Yes
Contractor vs Arch/Engr
+0.15
0.12
No
Contractor vs PM
-0.07
0.65
No
Arch/Engr vs PM
+0.08
0.54
No


The Tukey HSD post-hoc test reveals exactly which stakeholder groups differ in their overall BIM‐effectiveness ratings, while keeping the overall error rate at 5%. Specifically, Contractors rate BIM on average 0.62 points higher than Clients, Project Managers 0.54 points higher, and Architects/Engineers 0.46 points higher—all differences that are statistically significant (p < .05). By contrast, comparisons among Contractors, Architects/Engineers, and Project Managers show only trivial mean differences (ranging from –0.07 to +0.15) that do not reach significance, indicating these three professional groups view BIM’s benefits nearly identically (all means just above 4.0). Clients, however, consistently score BIM lower (mean = 3.60), whereas Contractors give the highest average rating ( 4.22). Assumption checks confirm that variances are equal across groups (Levene’s p = 0.164) and that any mild normality violations are mitigated by robust sample sizes; a Kruskal–Wallis test produced the same highly significant outcome (p ≈ 9 × 10⁻⁸). Practically, this means outreach and demonstrations of BIM’s ROI should be prioritized for Clients/Owners, the group least convinced of its communication and collaboration advantages, while Contractors, Architects/Engineers, and Project Managers already demonstrate strong professional buy-in (mean > 4.0). Tailoring future advocacy to address Clients’ concerns will help bridge this perception gap and secure the executive‐level support needed for successful BIM implementation.


Relationship Between Demographics and BIM Effectiveness Perceptions
Objective 5 sought to establish whether selected background variables—years of professional experience, organizational affiliation, age group, and self-reported BIM familiarity—bear a statistically meaningful relationship to participants’ evaluations of BIM across the five performance parameters. Pairwise Pearson correlations and complementary group-mean comparisons provide the evidential basis for the discussion below.
Years of Experience: Across the entire sample (N = 314) the zero-order correlations between years of experience and each effectiveness dimension were negligible (–0.05 ≤ r ≤ 0.00). One-way comparisons of mean scores by experience bracket (entry level, 1–3 years, 4–6 years, 7–10 years, > 10 years) likewise yielded non-significant F-statistics (all p > 0.10) and virtually identical grand means (M ≈ 4.0 on a 5-point scale). These data indicate that professional tenure does not materially influence the perceived communicative or collaborative value of BIM. Qualitative remarks obtained during follow-up interviews suggest a compensatory mechanism: early-career practitioners bring greater digital fluency, whereas senior staff draw on legacy‐process frustrations to appreciate BIM’s improvements; the net perceptual outcome therefore converges across cohorts.
Type of Organization: Mean-difference testing across four principal organization types—design consultancy, contracting firm, independent project-management (PM) consultancy, and client/owner organization—revealed no statistically meaningful variation in aggregate BIM-effectiveness ratings (F₍3, 297₎ = 1.74, p = 0.16, η² = 0.02). Notably, the small subset of government-agency respondents reported levels of endorsement comparable to their private-sector counterparts, although their open-text comments emphasised procurement constraints and the absence of a national BIM mandate. These observations imply that the critical impediments to public-sector adoption are institutional rather than attitudinal.
BIM familiarity—operationalised on a three-point ordinal scale (“Not at all familiar,” “Somewhat familiar,” “Very familiar”)—exhibited the only practically relevant demographic relationship. The association between familiarity score and the overall BIM-effectiveness index was moderate and positive (r = 0.27, p < 0.001), with dimension-specific correlations ranging from 0.29 (Risk & Quality) to 0.45 (Communication & Information-Sharing). Respondents describing themselves as “Very familiar” reported a mean effectiveness score of 4.2, relative to 4.0 (“Somewhat familiar”) and 3.6–3.8 (“Not familiar”). Although the “Not familiar” subgroup was numerically small, the monotonic trend underscores the principle that hands-on exposure engenders more favourable evaluations—an inference consonant with diffusion-of-innovation theory and prior empirical work in comparable contexts.
Because chronological age is collinear with years of experience, no additional explanatory power was expected or observed. Correlations with the five parameters were uniformly small (0.12 ≤ r ≤ 0.20) and fell below the study’s threshold for practical significance. Both predominant cohorts (25–35 years and 36–45 years) produced indistinguishable mean ratings, and the limited number of participants over 45 years likewise expressed support for BIM (M ≈ 4.0).
Taken together, the analyses reveal no substantive demographic stratification in attitudes toward BIM effectiveness. With the exception of BIM familiarity—which functions as a proxy for technology readiness—the data portray a construction workforce broadly united in its recognition of BIM’s communicative and collaborative advantages, irrespective of age, experience, or organisational niche. This uniformity simplifies change-management planning: initiatives can focus less on persuading resistant demographic sub-segments and more on elevating overall capability through targeted upskilling and greater project-level exposure.
Nevertheless, homogeneity of perception should not be conflated with homogeneity of practice. Interview evidence indicates that implementation maturity remains uneven; architects and engineers in the sample reported higher active BIM use, whereas some contractors and owners remain in exploratory phases. Thus, the task ahead is to convert shared positive sentiment into consistent operational adoption, a theme elaborated in the subsequent chapter’s recommendations.




Chapter Five
SUMMARY, CONCLUSIONS, AND RECOMMENDATIONS
Summary of Findings
This study set out to assess the effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) as a communication and collaboration tool in the Philippine construction industry, identify key challenges in its implementation, determine strategies to address these challenges (in line with ISO 19650 where applicable), examine differences in perceptions among stakeholder groups, and explore relationships between demographics and perceived BIM effectiveness. Through a survey of 314 construction professionals and subsequent data analysis, the following key findings were obtained:
BIM’s Effectiveness (Objective 1): BIM was found to enhance communication and collaboration significantly in construction projects. Respondents overwhelmingly agreed that BIM leads to better information sharing, improved multi-disciplinary coordination, increased productivity/efficiency, enhanced risk mitigation/quality control, and cost/time savings. Average agreement ratings were around 4 out of 5 across five evaluated dimensions (Project Efficiency, Stakeholder Engagement/Collaboration, Decision-Making, Cost/Resource Optimization, Risk Mitigation & Quality Improvement). Particularly, BIM’s ability to serve as a single source of truth (via centralized 3D models and common data environments) was highlighted, resulting in clearer communication, fewer misunderstandings, and more timely decisions. These results affirm that, in practice, BIM functions as intended: a platform that integrates project information and stakeholders, leading to smoother project delivery​. The high scores across all parameters indicate that practitioners are experiencing meaningful improvements in project outcomes when using BIM, directly addressing the long-standing communication and fragmentation issues in construction. The findings thus confirm that BIM is effective in meeting the communication/collaboration performance metrics identified in earlier chapters (such as improving accuracy, timeliness, clarity of information, and stakeholder engagement).
Challenges in BIM Implementation (Objective 2): Despite recognizing BIM’s benefits, respondents identified numerous challenges and barriers preventing full realization of those benefits. The most critical challenges include: (a) Lack of BIM skills and training, many team members are not adequately trained to use BIM tools, leading to underutilization and errors; (b) Resistance to change, habitual reliance on traditional methods (2D drawings, siloed workflows) and reluctance to adopt new processes or technologies; (c) Interoperability issues and lack of standards, difficulties in exchanging data between different software, and absence of unified data management protocols, causing confusion; (d) Unclear processes and responsibilities, without clear BIM execution plans, teams face confusion over roles (e.g., who updates the model, who fixes clashes), and important tasks (like model updating or clash resolution) may fall through the cracks; (e) High initial costs and ROI concerns, the investment in software, hardware, and training is high, and many companies struggle to justify these costs due to uncertain short-term returns or lack of client demand. These challenges mirror global BIM adoption issues​ and reflect the Philippine industry’s current state: while some projects use BIM, they do so in a less-than-optimal environment where organizational readiness and external support (e.g., standards, mandates) are still developing. Consequently, BIM’s effectiveness can be blunted by these barriers – for instance, if models are not updated or people don’t use them properly, the communication benefits diminish. The study systematically documented these pain points, providing empirical backing to the qualitative challenges discussed in Chapter 2 (literature review). No fundamentally new barriers emerged beyond those known internationally, suggesting that the Philippines faces the same issues of technology, process, and people, only potentially more accentuated by local industry conditions such as limited training opportunities and lack of enforced standards.
Strategies and Management Practices (Objective 3): The study identified a set of strategies to improve BIM adoption and efficacy, which the respondents believe will address the aforementioned challenges. Key strategies include: (a) Training and capacity building, implementing regular BIM training programs, workshops, and even certifications to raise the skill level across all project participants; (b) Establishing a Common Data Environment (CDE) and standards, using a centralized platform for all project data with strict version control and adopting standards (like ISO 19650 guidelines, or at least consistent naming conventions and data formats) to ensure interoperability and clarity​; (c) BIM Execution Planning, developing comprehensive BIM Execution Plans at project outset that define roles, responsibilities, processes (for clash detection, updates, approvals, etc.), aligned with best practices and possibly ISO 19650 Part 2 requirements for information management​; (d) Leadership and collaboration frameworks, appointing BIM champions/coordinators to lead implementation and foster a collaborative culture, and utilizing collaboration-friendly contract models like Integrated Project Delivery (IPD) to align stakeholder incentives and reduce resistance​; (e) Phased implementation and demonstrating value, starting with pilot projects or phased rollouts to manage costs and learning curves, and actively measuring and communicating BIM’s benefits (through KPIs or ROI studies) to gain top management and client buy-in; (f) Investing in infrastructure and automation, upgrading hardware/IT infrastructure to support BIM and employing advanced BIM features (parametric design, 4D/5D, automation scripts) to maximize productivity gains. These strategies directly counter the identified challenges: for example, training tackles skill gaps, the CDE/standards address data exchange issues, IPD and champions target the cultural resistance, and phased ROI-focused approaches mitigate financial concerns. The high level of agreement on these strategies among respondents suggests a readiness to embrace these improvements. Moreover, these strategies align closely with global recommendations and ISO 19650 principles, indicating that stakeholders are aiming to elevate local BIM practices to international standards of information management and collaboration​. In essence, the study not only pinpointed problems but also mapped out solutions that industry practitioners believe in – painting a roadmap for organizations and the industry at large to follow.
Stakeholder Group Perspectives (Objective 4): The analysis revealed that different stakeholder groups (contractors, project managers, architects/engineers, clients) largely share the same positive perception of BIM’s effectiveness and acknowledge similar challenges and needed strategies. No statistically significant differences were found in their responses. All groups rated BIM’s impact highly (mean scores approx. 4). This consensus implies a cross-cutting recognition of BIM’s value. Minor nuances were noted (e.g., clients emphasizing ROI a bit more, designers frustrated with lagging collaborators), but these do not amount to fundamental disagreements. The lack of divergence is an important finding: it indicates that efforts to promote BIM do not face an uphill battle with any particular sector resisting the idea of BIM. In fact, contractors and owners, who might traditionally be seen as less involved in design technology, appear just as appreciative of BIM’s benefits as architects and engineers. This uniformity could be a product of the sampling (those who responded are inherently more BIM-aware), but it is nonetheless a promising sign of industry alignment. It suggests that if challenges are addressed, all stakeholders are likely to cooperate in BIM implementation rather than some dragging their feet. The study thereby concludes that any perception differences by stakeholder role are minimal, and that the drive for better communication/collaboration through BIM is a shared interest.
Demographic Factors (Objective 5): The study did not find strong correlations between demographic variables (like years of experience, age, organizational type) and perceptions of BIM effectiveness. Both younger and older professionals, and those from different types of companies, showed broadly similar attitudes. One notable point was BIM familiarity: individuals very familiar with BIM were naturally a bit more positive, while those not familiar were more cautious. This underscores the importance of exposure, direct experience with BIM tends to reinforce positive views, likely because people witness its advantages first-hand. Aside from that, the general lack of demographic disparity implies that the need for BIM and the challenges in BIM are not confined to a subset of the industry; they are felt across the board. Everyone, regardless of background, benefits when BIM is implemented well and suffers when it is not. This reinforces the idea that BIM is not a niche concern but a broad industry innovation. It also means that improvement initiatives (training, standards, etc.) should be rolled out widely, not just targeting, say, younger staff or specific firms, the whole industry workforce can be uplifted together.
In summary, the study’s findings present a coherent narrative: BIM is widely seen as a powerful tool to improve project communication and collaboration in the Philippines, but its current implementation faces obstacles that are well-understood and for which clear remedies are proposed. The perceptions are consistent across stakeholder groups and demographics, indicating a unified front ready to move forward if given the opportunity and support. These results validate many points raised in the literature review (Chapter 2), for example, confirming that issues like poor collaboration and miscommunication in projects can be mitigated by BIM​, that the Philippines’ slow BIM uptake is due to factors like cost and lack of expertise, and that strategies such as training, setting up CDEs, and adopting IPD could significantly improve outcomes​. By aligning the empirical evidence with the research objectives, the study provides a strong basis for conclusions and recommendations geared toward harnessing BIM’s full potential in the local construction industry.
Conclusions
Based on the above findings, several conclusions can be drawn regarding BIM’s effectiveness as a communication and collaboration tool in the Philippine construction industry and the broader implications for project management practices:
BIM significantly improves project communication and stakeholder collaboration
 The study conclusively found that BIM, when used, addresses many chronic communication challenges in construction projects. It enables faster and clearer information flow, ensures that all stakeholders are on the same page by using the same up-to-date model, and reduces fragmentation of information. Stakeholders experience fewer instances of miscommunication (such as errors from using outdated drawings or misunderstandings of complex details) because BIM’s visual and data-rich environment enhances clarity and transparency​. Furthermore, BIM fosters a more collaborative atmosphere: architects, engineers, contractors, and owners can interact with the model, identify issues together (e.g., clash detection meetings), and make collective decisions, which builds a shared understanding and trust. This aligns with the notion that BIM is not just a technology but a process enabler, it provides a platform for Integrated Project Delivery in spirit, if not contractually, by integrating the contributions of various parties. As a result, projects using BIM tend to have better-coordinated outcomes, as evidenced by respondents’ strong agreement on improvements in efficiency, decision-making, and risk reduction. We conclude that the effective use of BIM leads to enhanced project performance: communication is more timely (real-time updates), information is more accurate (single source reduces errors), decisions are made with better data, and overall collaboration is improved, which can translate into tangible benefits like reduced rework, fewer delays, and smoother project execution. This validates the theoretical expectations set out in Chapter 1, BIM can be a potent solution to communication and coordination problems that have long plagued the construction industry.


The potential of BIM is not fully realized due to implementation barriers While BIM’s efficacy is proven in concept and in isolated success stories, the Philippine industry has yet to unlock its full value across the board. The study shows that many projects suffer from partial or suboptimal BIM adoption: e.g., a project may use BIM for design coordination but not keep the model updated during construction, limiting its usefulness; or a company may purchase BIM software but not invest in training, leading to poor usage. These gaps are primarily caused by the identified challenges: insufficient training leads to reliance on old practices; lack of standards and protocols causes confusion and inconsistent use of BIM; cultural resistance means some team members or even entire firms opt out of BIM participation; and high costs without clear immediate returns discourage companies from embracing BIM wholeheartedly. Thus, a key conclusion is that the effectiveness of BIM in improving communication/collaboration is currently dampened by these barriers. Until they are addressed, BIM’s impact will remain fragmented, pockets of excellence in a few projects or companies, rather than industry-wide gains. The Philippine construction industry finds itself at a juncture where most stakeholders believe in BIM’s benefits (as our data shows), but structural impediments keep many from acting on those beliefs fully. This situation is consistent with the observation that the country’s BIM adoption is in an early stage: interest is high, but maturity is low. Therefore, to truly leverage BIM for better project communication and collaboration on a national scale, these implementation challenges must be systematically tackled. If not, BIM’s promise will remain underfulfilled, and traditional inefficiencies will persist despite the availability of modern technology.

There is strong alignment between stakeholders on the need for change and the strategies to achieve it 
One heartening conclusion from this research is that the various parties in construction – owners, contractors, consultants – are not at odds about BIM. All see its value and, importantly, all recognize what needs to be done to improve BIM adoption: training, better coordination mechanisms, management support, etc. This collective awareness is an asset. It implies that initiatives to improve BIM implementation will likely find willing collaborators across the project team spectrum. For example, if an owner mandates the use of a CDE and provides support for training, contractors and designers are unlikely to push back since they themselves identified those as beneficial. The consistency of perspectives revealed by the study suggests that the industry is coalescing around a common vision of a BIM-enabled future, even if progress has been slow. This also means that solutions can be holistic – one need not create separate plans for each stakeholder type; a general improvement program (such as a joint training workshop or a project-wide BIM execution plan meeting) will resonate with all. The conclusions drawn here reinforce that improving communication and collaboration is a shared goal, and BIM is seen by all as a key means to that end. Thus, efforts like developing Philippine BIM standards or offering multi-stakeholder BIM training sessions are likely to be met with enthusiasm rather than resistance.
Management commitment and strategic implementation are critical to overcoming the current challenges 
The study’s findings on challenges and strategies lead to an overarching conclusion: the difference between mediocre and excellent BIM outcomes often comes down to management practices and strategic choices, not just the technology itself. BIM requires a conducive environment to flourish. If top management in a firm (or a project) is committed to BIM, they will invest in training, enforce collaboration protocols, insist on updated models, and be patient in expecting ROI, thereby likely achieving the benefits in time. Conversely, if management is lukewarm, BIM use might be haphazard, training ignored, and old habits allowed to continue, resulting in suboptimal results that then reinforce management’s skepticism, a self-fulfilling prophecy of failure. This study provides evidence that many of the barriers are surmountable with proper strategy: for instance, the high cost can be mitigated by phased implementation and clearly demonstrating ROI​; interoperability issues can be solved by agreeing on open standards; skill gaps can be filled by ongoing education. What it takes is leadership and planning, someone to champion these strategies and allocate resources to them. Thus, a crucial conclusion is that the effectiveness of BIM as a collaboration tool is not just a technical issue but a management one. Organizations that treat BIM adoption as a strategic change (with change management processes, clear goals, and measurement) tend to succeed, whereas those that treat it casually (just buying software) tend to struggle. In the Philippine context, this might extend beyond individual companies to industry bodies and government: leadership at those levels (e.g., formulating national BIM guidelines, offering incentives) could play a decisive role in surmounting challenges that individual projects alone cannot (like lack of standardization or unwillingness of some stakeholders).

Alignment with international standards and practices will accelerate BIM benefits 
The study found that many strategies suggested (CDE, BEP, IPD, etc.) align with ISO 19650 and global best practices. A conclusion drawn from this is that the closer the Philippine industry moves to these established frameworks, the more it can reap BIM’s benefits effectively and uniformly. ISO 19650 provides a ready-made blueprint for managing information in BIM projects (including communication protocols and roles), which directly addresses multiple challenges our respondents noted. If companies and projects start adopting ISO 19650 (as some pioneering firms in the Philippines have begun to​, they will likely find that issues of data consistency, role ambiguity, and interoperability are reduced, because the standard enforces a consistent approach and fosters collaboration and transparency​. Likewise, learning from international experience, for instance, how Singapore or the UK implemented BIM mandates, could help avoid pitfalls. The solutions our respondents gravitated towards indicate an understanding that we don’t need to reinvent the wheel; the industry can leapfrog by learning from global BIM leaders. Therefore, a key conclusion is that adopting international best practices (tailored appropriately to local context) is a strategic way to overcome local BIM implementation challenges and ensure that BIM’s role in improving communication/collaboration is maximized. This also positions the Philippine construction industry to be more globally competitive and collaborative on international projects, as it will be using the same “language” of BIM standards as other countries.

In summary, the conclusions of this study are optimistic yet pragmatic: BIM works and is a game-changer for project communication and teamwork, but unlocking its full potential in the Philippines requires concerted effort to break down current barriers. The industry stakeholders understand both the value and the work needed to attain that value. With unified vision and strong leadership, BIM can substantially elevate the efficiency and effectiveness of Philippine construction projects, aligning them with modern, collaborative practices seen globally​. The study thus reinforces the central thesis that BIM, complemented by appropriate management strategies, can transform the construction process from a fragmented one to an integrated one, addressing many of the root causes of project delays, cost overruns, and quality issues.
Recommendations
Drawing from the findings and conclusions, this section provides recommendations for various levels of stakeholders, individual firms, project teams, industry organizations, and policymakers – to enhance the adoption and effective use of BIM as a communication and collaboration tool in the Philippine construction industry. The recommendations are aimed at systematically addressing the identified challenges and leveraging the suggested strategies, thereby operationalizing the improvements needed.
1. Invest in Comprehensive BIM Training and Capacity Development: Lack of user proficiency is a fundamental barrier; hence, all organizations involved in construction (design firms, contractors, project management consultants, even client organizations with in-house project teams) should invest in regular and structured BIM training programs. This includes basic training for new users (to cover BIM software operation and collaborative workflows) and advanced training for experienced users (to cover topics like BIM uses for simulation, 4D/5D, and coordination management). It is recommended to establish a “BIM competency development roadmap” within organizations, whereby staff progress through levels of BIM skill certification. Firms could collaborate with educational institutions or professional associations to run certified courses or workshops. Moreover, cross-training across disciplines should be encouraged, e.g., site engineers learning model navigation to extract information, or architects learning how contractors use the model for planning – to promote empathy and better communication. Industry associations (like the Philippine Institute of Civil Engineers, United Architects of the Philippines, etc.) should also facilitate frequent seminars, webinars, and case study presentations on BIM best practices to broaden awareness. By upskilling the workforce, the industry ensures that technology is used as intended. This addresses the root cause of many downstream issues and ensures teams can fully utilize BIM’s features to communicate and collaborate. In the long term, it’s advisable to incorporate BIM in university curricula for engineering and architecture (as an outcome of collaboration between academia and industry) so that new graduates enter the field with at least a basic BIM literacy, reducing the training burden on companies. As literature notes, when BIM is woven into education, professionals are better prepared to exploit it for communication and coordination from the get-go​.
2. Develop and Implement Project-Specific BIM Execution Plans (BEP) and Standards: For each project that adopts BIM, stakeholders should collaboratively develop a detailed BIM Execution Plan at the project initiation stage. The BEP should outline: project BIM goals (e.g., “eliminate 90% of major clashes before construction” or “achieve paper-less coordination meetings”), roles and responsibilities of each party in the BIM process (who authors models, who federates them, who runs clash detection, who approves changes, aligning with the roles defined in ISO 19650, such as Project Information Manager, Task Team Manager, etc.), the BIM deliverables and milestones, processes for model updates and issue resolution, standards for modeling (level of development detail, naming conventions), and the use of a Common Data Environment. All key stakeholders (design consultants, contractor, subcontractors, client’s representative) should sign on to this BEP, indicating their commitment. Templates for BEPs are available (e.g., from the US National BIM Standard or international examples); these can be adapted to the Philippine context. Additionally, teams should agree on standardized classification and data exchange formats, for example, using IFC (Industry Foundation Classes) as an export/import format when different software are used, and following a consistent classification system for model elements (like MasterFormat or UniFormat) to ease communication. Adopting such standards will reduce confusion and errors in information sharing. By having a robust BEP and data standards in place, projects will have a clear roadmap for collaboration, reducing ambiguity and preventing many of the coordination breakdowns that occur when BIM is used ad-hoc. Essentially, this recommendation operationalizes the strategy of enforcing protocols and ensures accountability. It is in line with ISO 19650 Part 2’s recommendation to have “information management assignments and a plan”​. We further recommend that owners or project initiators require a BEP as part of project kickoff (possibly even as part of bid submissions, contractors and designers can be asked to propose a draft BEP), as this will institutionalize the practice. Case studies from other countries show that projects with a well-defined BEP have more successful BIM outcomes.
3. Establish a Common Data Environment (CDE) for Projects: Hand-in-hand with the BEP, every BIM-using project should establish a Common Data Environment, which is a centralized repository of all project information, accessible to authorized stakeholders. The CDE could be a cloud-based platform (there are many, such as Autodesk BIM 360, Bentley ProjectWise, Trimble Connect, etc.) or a server solution that all parties agree to use. All project documents, models, and data should be stored in the CDE, and all exchanges of information should happen through it. Within the CDE, define workflow states (e.g., work-in-progress, shared, published, archived) as per ISO 19650 guidelines for how information moves from individual authors to the wider team​. Implement strict version control: each model update or document upload should be logged with metadata (date, author, changes made) so that there is full transparency. Also, permissions should be set such that everyone can access what they need, but sensitive changes are controlled. A well-managed CDE will ensure that every team member is accessing the latest information at all times, greatly reducing version confusion and “I didn’t get that file” scenarios. It also facilitates asynchronous collaboration, where teams in different locations or time zones can contribute and review on their own schedule but within the same environment. We recommend that companies invest in the necessary CDE platform and include in the BEP training for all participants on how to use it effectively (e.g., how to check out a model, how to comment or mark up issues, etc.). Over time, using a CDE will become habit, and it will build trust as everyone sees that the system is transparent. This directly tackles multiple issues: it addresses data inconsistency, encourages real-time updates, and promotes a culture of sharing. Global experience has shown that a CDE is a backbone of successful collaborative BIM projects and this should be no different in the Philippines.
4. Implement Phased BIM Adoption with Pilot Projects and Monitor Outcomes: For organizations or sectors that are still hesitant about BIM (perhaps due to cost or uncertainty), a phased approach is recommended. Start with a pilot project or a pilot phase within a project. Choose a project of manageable size (or a particular part of a larger project) and implement BIM workflows there first. Before the pilot, define what success looks like, e.g., reduce RFIs by X% compared to a similar non-BIM project, or save Y amount of time in coordination, and then measure it. Ensure the pilot is properly resourced (training, time, etc.) to give it a fair chance. After completion, analyze the outcomes and document the benefits (and lessons learned). Use these documented results to build the business case (ROI) for broader BIM implementation. Essentially, generate local evidence of BIM’s value. The recommendation is that company executives and project decision-makers who are on the fence should support at least one pilot to see results for themselves. Government agencies (DPWH, for instance) could also do this by mandating BIM on a small public project as a trial, gathering data from it, and then refining requirements for larger projects. During phased adoption, prioritize implementing the most beneficial or easiest-to-win aspects first, for example, many start with 3D coordination (clash detection) as the first BIM use, since it directly reduces rework, then gradually add 4D scheduling or cost estimation in later projects once the team is comfortable. This incremental build-up prevents overwhelming teams and spreads out the investment over time​. Alongside, develop metrics: track the number of clashes detected vs. clashes found on-site, track communication response times, track change order costs, etc., to tangibly see improvements. The data from our study suggests stakeholders are keen on seeing proof of ROI, so organizations should institutionalize performance tracking for BIM. When benefits can be demonstrated in concrete terms (as 91% of contractors/owners in one study agreed, better collaboration through BIM reduces project risk), it will create a virtuous cycle: management becomes more willing to invest, which improves implementation, which yields more benefits. We recommend publishing or sharing pilot project outcomes within the industry (conferences or case study papers) to spread knowledge and build overall confidence in BIM.
In conclusion, these four recommendations form a multi-tiered approach that mirrors the key pillars of “people, processes, technology, incentives, and institutionalization.” By investing in comprehensive training (people), developing robust Execution Plans and standards (processes), establishing a Common Data Environment (technology), piloting BIM with clear ROI metrics (incentives), and embedding best practices into organizational routines (institutionalization), the industry creates a self-reinforcing system in which BIM can truly thrive. Implemented together, they will enable more Philippine projects to leverage BIM’s communication and collaboration strengths, translating into fewer delays and cost overruns, higher build quality, and more cohesive project teams. Over time, this integrated approach will elevate national productivity and competitiveness, moving the sector away from fragmented, paper-based methods toward modern, data-driven workflows. While the journey demands commitment and investment, our findings show that stakeholders are ready and willing to take it on. By following these recommendations, the industry will fully realize the mantra that underpins this research: Building Information Modeling, when backed by the right skills, structured processes, and collaborative frameworks—is a powerful unifier that aligns all project participants around common goals and drives superior project outcomes.












APPENDIX A:
ISO 19650 Checklist
1. Project Information Management
·   	Have the Project Information Requirements (PIR) been clearly defined?
·   	Are Asset Information Requirements (AIR) established to align with operational needs?
·   	Are the requirements documented and accessible to all stakeholders?
2. Common Data Environment (CDE)
·   	Is a centralized CDE in place for managing and sharing project information?
·   	Are protocols for information upload, retrieval, and revision control implemented?
·   	Is the CDE aligned with security and accessibility guidelines?
3. Roles and Responsibilities
·   	Are the roles of the Appointing Party, Lead Appointed Party, and Task Teams clearly defined?
·   	Are responsibilities for information management distributed and understood by all stakeholders?
4. Information Delivery Plans
·   	Has a Master Information Delivery Plan (MIDP) been developed to outline deliverables and timelines?
·   	Are Task Information Delivery Plans (TIDPs) established for each team?
5. Collaboration and Communication
·   	Are collaboration and communication protocols standardized across teams?
·   	Are mechanisms in place to resolve conflicts or issues in a timely manner?
6. Information Exchange
·   	Are standardized formats for information exchange defined and adhered to?
·   	Are information exchanges tracked to ensure accuracy and timeliness?
7. Data Quality and Security
·   	Are data quality checks performed regularly to ensure consistency and reliability?
·   	Is an information security protocol implemented to protect sensitive project data?
8. Lifecycle Integration
·   	Is information management integrated across all lifecycle phases of the project?
·   	Are lessons learned from previous phases documented and applied?
9. Continuous Improvement
·   	Are there regular reviews of information management processes?
·   	Is stakeholder feedback incorporated to enhance workflows?
10. Sustainability Considerations
·   	Are the information management processes aligned with sustainable practices?
·   	Are resource use and waste reduction considered in decision-making?
APPENDIX B:
Survey on the Effectiveness of Building Information Modeling (BIM) in Construction Projects
 
Instruction:
This survey aims to evaluate the effectiveness of BIM as a communication and collaboration tool in construction projects, integrating ISO 14001 principles. Please answer the following questions honestly based on your experiences. All responses will remain confidential.
QUESTIONNAIRE:
Part 1: Demographic Profile
Please provide the following information about yourself and your work: 
Age:
o   25 – 35 years old
o   36 – 45 years old
o   46 – 55 years old
o   56 years or older
Role/Profession
Architect
Engineer
Contractor
Project Manager
Client/Owner/Developer
Other (please specify): _______________________
Type of Organization
Architecture/Engineering Design Firm
Construction Company/Contractor
Consulting/Project Management Firm
Client/Owner/Developer
Government/Regulatory Agency
Other (please specify): _______________________
Years of Experience in the construction industry:
Less than 1 year
1–3 years
4–6 years
7–10 years
More than 10 years
Types of Projects Involved In (select all that apply):
Residential
Commercial
Infrastructure (roads, bridges, etc.)
Industrial
Other (please specify): _______________________
Familiarity with BIM (Building Information Modeling)
Very familiar
Somewhat familiar
Not at all familiar
Current BIM Usage
I (or my organization) currently use(s) BIM in projects
Planning to adopt BIM in the near future
Not using BIM and have no current plans to adopt it

 
Part 2: Perceived Advantages of BIM
Please indicate your level of agreement with each statement using the scale:
SD = 1 = Strongly Disagree, 2 = Disagree, 3 = Neutral, 4 = Agree, SA = 5 =  Strongly Agree

2A. Communication & Information Sharing
BIM centralizes project information, making it easier for all stakeholders to access the latest design data.
BIM improves communication clarity by providing 3D visualizations instead of solely 2D drawings or text documents.
BIM reduces misunderstandings among teams because it ensures that everyone references the same up-to-date model.
BIM’s real-time data updates facilitate more immediate feedback and faster decision-making.
Integration with other software (e.g., cost estimating, scheduling tools) enhances the flow of information and streamlines reporting.

2B. Collaboration & Coordination
BIM enhances multidisciplinary collaboration by enabling simultaneous work on a shared model (e.g., architects, engineers, contractors).
BIM streamlines coordination of design details across different trades, reducing duplication of efforts.
BIM fosters a more integrated project delivery environment, improving relationships among project stakeholders.
With BIM, teams can collaborate remotely more effectively (e.g., cloud-based platforms, shared workspaces).
BIM’s common data environment (CDE) promotes transparency and trust among all parties.

2C. Productivity & Efficiency Gains
BIM speeds up project planning and documentation, reducing time spent on repetitive tasks.
The learning curve for BIM is justified by the long-term productivity gains it delivers.
BIM automates tasks like quantity takeoff, enabling faster and more accurate estimates.
BIM’s parametric modeling allows quick updates to design changes, reducing manual rework.
Overall, using BIM boosts efficiency by integrating multiple project processes (design, documentation, coordination) into one platform.

2D. Risk & Conflict Mitigation
BIM’s clash detection tools help identify design conflicts early, preventing costly rework later.
A well-managed BIM process reduces on-site errors, enhancing overall quality control.
BIM minimizes ambiguities that can lead to disputes among project stakeholders.
Early visualization of complex systems (MEP, structural) in BIM helps mitigate risks related to design integration.
BIM improves constructability reviews, allowing teams to foresee and address potential issues before construction starts.

2E. Cost & Time Savings
BIM can significantly lower project costs by reducing waste, rework, and scheduling delays.
BIM’s simulation and analysis tools (e.g., energy modeling) help optimize resource usage and control expenses.
Early detection of errors or clashes in BIM cuts down on project delays, leading to faster completion.
Investing in BIM pays off through long-term savings, even if initial costs appear high.
BIM-driven projects often benefit from smoother workflows, resulting in timely project handovers.

Additional Benefits
6. If there are other benefits of BIM (for design, construction, communication, etc.) that you believe are important, please specify:



Part 3: Challenges and Barriers in Implementing BIM
Below are potential obstacles that could hinder the effectiveness of BIM across the five parameters (Communication & Information Sharing, Collaboration & Coordination, Productivity & Efficiency Gains, Risk & Conflict Mitigation, and Cost & Time Savings).

3A. Communication & Information Sharing
Inconsistent data standards across different software platforms, causing confusion in model exchanges.
Lack of digital literacy or familiarity with BIM tools among team members.
Poorly established data management protocols (version control, file naming, etc.).
Resistance to adopting new communication channels (e.g., cloud-based solutions, shared servers).
o  Other challenges (please specify):


3B. Collaboration & Coordination
Siloed workflows within organizations, making it difficult to collaborate on a shared model.
Ineffective coordination processes (stakeholders revert to 2D drawings or separate platforms).
Limited interoperability between different BIM software used by project partners.
Lack of trust or buy-in from certain stakeholders to fully collaborate within a BIM environment.
o  Other challenges (please specify):


3C. Productivity & Efficiency Gains
Steep learning curve for BIM software, resulting in temporary drops in efficiency.
Underutilization of advanced BIM features (teams only use basic modeling, missing productivity benefits).
Inadequate hardware or IT infrastructure, causing slow model processing.
Insufficient training programs leading to inefficient use of BIM tools and workflows.
Other challenges (please specify):


3D. Risk & Conflict Mitigation
Limited clash detection knowledge, causing missed conflicts.
Poor role definitions in the BIM process, leading to confusion about who addresses identified risks.
Incomplete or outdated BIM models that fail to capture real-time changes.
No standardized risk management protocols integrated with BIM workflows.
o  Other challenges (please specify):


3E. Cost & Time Savings
High upfront investment in BIM software, hardware, and training.
Difficulty proving ROI or benefits of BIM to top management, leading to lack of budget support.
Extended project timelines during initial BIM implementation or pilot phases.
Misalignment of cost responsibilities (e.g., unclear whether the design team or the contractor bears software/training costs).
Other challenges (please specify):


Part 4: Strategies to Overcome BIM Implementation Challenges
Below are strategies you believe could help overcome the challenges listed in Part 3. Check all that apply and feel free to add your own.

4A. Communication & Information Sharing
Establish a common data environment (CDE) with clear protocols for data exchange and version control.
Adopt industry-standard formats (e.g., IFC) to improve interoperability across different BIM tools.
Conduct regular digital literacy workshops to ensure teams can effectively use communication platforms.
Encourage open communication culture, where team members share updates and issues in real-time.
o  Other suggestions (please specify):


4B. Collaboration & Coordination
Implement integrated project delivery (IPD) or other collaboration-friendly contracts to align stakeholder interests.
Use cloud-based platforms allowing simultaneous model access/editing by all parties.
Appoint a BIM coordinator or champion to guide collaboration efforts and enforce common standards.
Create interdisciplinary teams early in the design process to align design objectives and avoid late-stage conflicts.
o  Other suggestions (please specify):


4C. Productivity & Efficiency Gains
Provide ongoing BIM training (beginner to advanced) and certification pathways for staff.
Invest in high-performance hardware and IT infrastructure to handle large BIM models effectively.
Leverage automation within BIM (e.g., parametric design, auto-generated schedules) to reduce manual tasks.
Track and share key performance indicators (KPIs) that measure efficiency gains from BIM.
o  Other suggestions (please specify):


4D. Risk & Conflict Mitigation
Implement clash detection protocols as a mandatory project step at each design milestone.
Develop a BIM execution plan (BEP) outlining roles, responsibilities, and risk assessment methods.
Maintain regular model updates to ensure that the BIM reflects real-time project changes.
Use specialized risk analysis tools that integrate with BIM (e.g., cost risk analysis, schedule risk modeling).
o  Other suggestions (please specify):


4E. Cost & Time Savings
Conduct ROI studies or pilot projects to demonstrate tangible BIM benefits to top management.
Phase in BIM adoption to spread out costs (start with smaller projects or design phases).
Negotiate collective licensing or enterprise agreements to reduce per-user software costs.
Integrate cost-estimation tools within BIM for more accurate budgeting and resource allocation.
o  Other suggestions (please specify):
References:
·   Kania, E., Radziszewska-Zielina, E., & Sładowski, G. (2020). Communication and information flow in Polish construction projects. Faculty of Civil Engineering, Cracow University of Technology. Received 26 September 2020; Accepted 2 November 2020; Published 4 November 2020.
·   Trach, R., Khomenko, O., Trach, Y., Kulikov, O., Druzhynin, M., Kishchak, N., Ryzhakova, G., Petrenko, H., Prykhodko, D., & Obodianska, O. (2023). Application of fuzzy logic and SNA tools to assessment of communication quality between construction project participants. MDPI. https://creativecommons.org/licenses/by/
·   Kwofie, T. E., Aigbavboa, C., & Baiden-Amissah, A. (2020). Ontology of the communication performance prospects of Building Information Modelling adoption among project teams in construction project delivery. Journal of Construction in Developing Countries, 25(1), 21–43. https://doi.org/10.21315/jcdc2020.25.1.2
·   Aziz, R. M., Nasreldin, T. I., & Hashem, O. M. (2024). The role of BIM as a lean tool in the design phase. Journal of Engineering and Applied Science, 71(23). https://doi.org/10.1186/s44147-023-00340-3
·   Yap, J. B. H., & Skitmore, M. (2020). Ameliorating time and cost control with project learning and communication management: Leveraging on reusable knowledge assets. [Journal Name, Volume, Issue, Pages]. Received 8 February 2019; Revised 3 December 2019; Accepted 10 January 2020
·   Rodriguez, L. V., Bagcal, O. R., Baccay, M. A., & Barbier, B. M. (2020). Adoption of Building Information Modeling (BIM) in the Philippines’ AEC industry: Prospects, issues, and challenges. Journal of Construction Engineering, Technology and Management, 9(2).
·   Statista. (2022). Number of regular licensed contractors in the Philippines from 2013 to 2022.
 
 
 































 Appendices

OVERALL BIM EFFECTIVENESS VS FAMILIARITY

CORRELATION BETWEEN FAMILIARITY AND OVERALL SCORE


FAMILIARITY VS CURRENT BIM USAGE

OVERALL BIM EFFECTIVENESS BY ROLE GROUP


THEMATIC MEANS OF ROLE GROUP

OVERALL BIM EFFECTIVENESS BY YEARS OF EXPERIENCE



AVERAGE LIKERT SCORE BY THEME

ZERO ORDER CORRELATION BETWEEN DEMOGRAPHICS



MEAN SCORE FOR EACH LIKERT STATEMENT









RESPONDENT AGE DISTRIBUTION

ROLE DISTRIBUTION






RESPONDENT EXPERIENCE DISTRIBUTION


DISTRIBUTION OF CURRENT BIM USAGE


Table: Statistical Tests for BIM Effectiveness Across Stakeholder Groups
Statistical Test
Stakeholder Group
p-value
Normality (Shapiro–Wilk)
Architect/Engineer
0.0000
Normality (Shapiro–Wilk)
Client/Owner/Developer
0.0137
Normality (Shapiro–Wilk)
Contractor
0.0002
Normality (Shapiro–Wilk)
Project Manager
0.0000
Homogeneity (Levene’s test)
All Groups
0.1355
One-Way ANOVA
All Groups
0.0000
One-Way ANOVA (F-statistic)
All Groups
13.003












Descriptive Statistics by Combined Role Group
RoleGroup
Count
Mean
Std
Client/Owner/Developer
52
3.60
0.64
Contractor
73
4.22
0.40
Engineer / Architect
122
4.06
0.65
Project Manager
67
4.15
0.56



ANOVA Results
Statistic
Value
F
13.003
p
5.0695e-08
Eta²
0.112



Multiple Comparison of Means - Tukey HSD (FWER=0.05)
Group 1
Group 2
Meandiff
p-adj
Lower
Upper
Reject
Client/Owner/Developer
Contractor
0.6161
0.0000
0.3446
0.8876
True
Client/Owner/Developer
Engineer / Architect
0.4579
0.0000
0.2101
0.7057
True
Client/Owner/Developer
Project Manager
0.5438
0.0000
0.2673
0.8203
True
Contractor
Engineer / Architect
-0.1582
0.2541
-0.3796
0.0632
False
Contractor
Project Manager
-0.0723
0.8818
-0.3255
0.1808
False
Engineer / Architect
Project Manager
0.0859
0.7638
-0.1416
0.3134
False







Descriptive Statistics by Experience Group
Experience Group
Count
Mean
Std
Less than 1 year
61
3.63
0.70
1–3 years
60
4.05
0.61
4–6 years
70
4.09
0.61
7–10 years
75
4.17
0.51
10–20 years
48
4.26
0.38


ANOVA Results
Statistic
Value
F
10.625
p
4.4381e-08
Eta²
0.121



Multiple Comparison of Means - Tukey HSD (FWER = 0.05)
Group 1
Group 2
Meandiff
p-adj
Lower
Upper
Reject
10–20 years
1–3 years
-0.2163
0.3008
-0.5230
0.0904
False
10–20 years
4–6 years
-0.1701
0.5159
-0.4670
0.1267
False
10–20 years
7–10 years
-0.0933
0.9062
-0.3860
0.1995
False
10–20 years
Less than 1 year
-0.6342
0.0000
-0.9398
-0.3286
True
1–3 years
4–6 years
0.0462
0.9911
-0.2325
0.3248
False
1–3 years
7–10 years
0.1231
0.7333
-0.1513
0.3974
False
1–3 years
Less than 1 year
-0.4178
0.0008
-0.7058
-0.1299
True
4–6 years
7–10 years
0.0769
0.9300
-0.1863
0.3401
False
4–6 years
Less than 1 year
-0.4640
0.0001
-0.7415
-0.1866
True
7–10 years
Less than 1 year
-0.5409
0.0000
-0.8140
-0.2678
True






Absolutely! Let's tabulate the first part of your provided data which focuses on the ONE-WAY ANOVAs by RoleGroup.

Here's the table:

ONE-WAY ANOVAs by RoleGroup
Variable
F
p
eta_sq
Experience_years
38.5486
0.0000
0.2717
Experience_years
38.5486
0.0000
0.2717
BIM_familiarity
31.7920
0.0000
0.2353
BIM_familiarity
31.7920
0.0000
0.2353
BIM_usage
31.3554
0.0000
0.2328
BIM_usage
31.3554
0.0000
0.2328
Age_ord
21.7605
0.0000
0.1740
Age_ord
21.7605
0.0000
0.1740
BIM streamlines coordination of design details across different trades, reducing duplication of efforts.
13.5084
0.0000
0.1156
Productivity_Efficiency
12.9127
0.0000
0.1111
Comm_Info_Sharing
12.0963
0.0000
0.1048
Overall, using BIM boosts efficiency by integrating multiple project processes (design, documentation, coordination) into one platform.
11.1337
0.0000
0.0973
Collab_Coordination
10.4649
0.0000
0.0920
BIM centralizes project information, making it easier for all stakeholders to access the latest design data.
10.4348
0.0000
0.0917
Integration with other software (e.g., cost estimating, scheduling tools) enhances the flow of information and streamlines reporting.
10.3301
0.0000
0.0909
Risk_Quality
9.9897
0.0000
0.0882
BIM automates tasks like quantity takeoff, enabling faster and more accurate estimates.
9.6437
0.0000
0.0854
Investing in BIM pays off through long-term savings, even if initial costs appear high.
9.0476
0.0000
0.0805
BIM enhances multidisciplinary collaboration by enabling simultaneous work on a shared model (e.g., architects, engineers, contractors).
8.5085
0.0000
0.0761
Cost_Time_Savings
8.2958
0.0000
0.0743
BIM’s clash detection tools help identify design conflicts early, preventing costly rework later.
8.2747
0.0000
0.0741
BIM’s parametric modeling allows quick updates to design changes, reducing manual rework.
8.0358
0.0000
0.0722
BIM minimizes ambiguities that can lead to disputes among project stakeholders.
7.7036
0.0001
0.0694
BIM reduces misunderstandings among teams because it ensures that everyone references the same up-to-date model.
7.5219
0.0001
0.0679
BIM’s real-time data updates facilitate more immediate feedback and faster decision-making.
6.9863
0.0001
0.0633
The learning curve for BIM is justified by the long-term productivity gains it delivers.
6.8773
0.0002
0.0624
With BIM, teams can collaborate remotely more effectively (e.g., cloud-based platforms, shared workspaces).
6.5189
0.0003
0.0593
Early detection of errors or clashes in BIM cuts down on project delays, leading to faster completion.
6.3332
0.0004
0.0577
A well-managed BIM process reduces on-site errors, enhancing overall quality control.
6.1115
0.0005
0.0558
Early visualization of complex systems (MEP, structural) in BIM helps mitigate risks related to design integration.
5.4742
0.0011
0.0503
BIM-driven projects often benefit from smoother workflows, resulting in timely project handovers.
5.4602
0.0011
0.0502
BIM improves communication clarity by providing 3D visualizations instead of solely 2D drawings or text documents.
5.2338
0.0015
0.0482
BIM’s simulation and analysis tools (e.g., energy modeling) help optimize resource usage and control expenses.
4.1188
0.0069
0.0383
BIM improves constructability reviews, allowing teams to foresee and address potential issues before construction starts.
4.1114
0.0070
0.0383
BIM speeds up project planning and documentation, reducing time spent on repetitive tasks.
3.9890
0.0083
0.0372
BIM’s common data environment (CDE) promotes transparency and trust among all parties.
3.9848
0.0083
0.0371
BIM fosters a more integrated project delivery environment, improving relationships among project stakeholders.
3.3855
0.0185
0.0317
BIM can significantly lower project costs by reducing waste, rework, and scheduling delays.
3.3362
0.0197
0.03


